Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for crime victim and survivor
services, is increased by $2,000,000 for distribution to  nonprofit entities to assist survivors
of domestic and sexual violence and human trafficking in maintaining or acquiring housing.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other  than
those described in section 2, chapter  557, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
Judicial Department, is increased by $275,752 for an Elder Justice Innovation grant.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other  than
those described in sections 2 and 6, chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by
the Housing and Community  Services Department, is increased by $1,681,331 for housing
counseling services.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 5 (2), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses, other than expenses
described in sections 6 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, from fees, moneys  or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds, corporate activity
tax funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education,  for op-
erations, is increased by  $1,668,814 to support the implementation of a comprehensive edu-
cator professional learning system.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 6 (3), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 1
ceived by the Department of Education for programs other than  those specified in sections
5 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021, for the Educator Advancement Council, is increased
by $3,488,205 for increases to Regional Educator Network Capacity grants.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations,  is increased by $1,416,158, for procurement
staff.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is  increased by $3,000,000 to temporarily increase behavioral health residential treat-
ment provider rates.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $9,000,000 to temporarily increase behavioral health  residential
treatment provider rates.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is increased by $2,400,746 to expand the duration  of Medicaid postpartum coverage to
12 months.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $6,390,858 to expand the  duration of Medicaid postpartum cov-
erage to 12 months.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by  $3,600,000 to
increase provider rates for employment services.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $9,093,426 for compensation changes driven by collective bargaining for workers
who are not state employees.
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $16,809,247 for compensation  changes driven by collective bargaining
for workers who are not state employees.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 2
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $10,906,574 for compensation changes driven by collective bargaining  for
workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $21,342,327 for compensation changes driven by collective bargain-
ing for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board  by section 1b (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  allocation to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees,  is decreased by
$20,000,000.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the General Counsel Division,
is increased by $2,310,592 for legal services to state agencies.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Criminal  Justice Division,
is decreased by $940,753 due to the withdrawal from the  federal High Intensity Drug Traf-
ficking Area program.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for the Criminal Justice Division, is increased by $1,157,838
to increase statewide criminal analytical support.
SECTION 20.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or  received by the Department of State Police, for patrol services, criminal inves-
tigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is increased  by
$3,039,868 for expenditure of funds received through the equitable sharing program.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is  increased by $11,323,221 for costs
incurred during the 2021 fire season.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for facility programs, is decreased by $188,357, for  the trans-
fer of positions between programs to establish new Diversity, Equity and Inclusion positions.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for community programs, is decreased by $191,677, for the
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 3
transfer of positions between programs to establish  new Diversity, Equity and Inclusion po-
sitions.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for program support,  is increased by $380,034, for the transfer
of positions between programs to establish new Diversity, Equity and Inclusion positions.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, for  community programs, is decreased
by $13,293, for the transfer of positions  between programs to establish new Diversity, Equity
and Inclusion positions.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, for program support, is increased  by
$13,293, for the transfer of positions between  programs to establish new Diversity, Equity
and Inclusion positions.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $2,432,008 for  the reorganiza-
tion of the office of the State Court Administrator.
SECTION 28. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $380,436 to implement the provisions of  chapter 400,
Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 444, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for the Appellate Division, is increased by
$259,969 for the Juvenile Appellate Section.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 560, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by $1,500,000,  for the expenditure of moneys transferred by the
Public Utilities Commission to the Broadband Fund established by section  4, chapter 17,
Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session),  for the planning and development of broadband
infrastructure.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5, chapter 426, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, other than
those described in section 3, chapter  426, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
Employment Department, is increased by $5,172,629 for  services to adult and dislocated
workers.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other than
those described in sections 2  and 6, chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by
the Housing and Community  Services Department, is increased by $39,769,368 for the Home-
owner Assistance program.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 4
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 640, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for adminis-
trative expenses, is increased by $504,000.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 504, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Board of Medical Imaging, is increased  by $202,000, to address
increasing investigatory workload, increased board stipends and other miscellaneous costs.
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1, chapter 311, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Real Estate Agency,  is increased by $151,083, for the eLicense
information technology replacement project.
SECTION 36.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter 348, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the  State Board of Tax Practitioners, is increased by $72,100, for
operating expenses.
SECTION 37.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for fire protection, is increased  by $46,298,469 for costs
associated with the 2021 fire season.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2021, collected
or received by the State Forestry  Department, for fire protection, is increased by $78,218,491
for the processing of payments of costs from the 2021 fire season.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to the State Forestry Department for fire pro-
tection expenses, is decreased by $6,146,267.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Department of Aviation, for operations, is in-
creased by $766,259.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department  of Aviation, for pavement mainte-
nance, is increased by $379,730.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 5
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Department of Transportation by section 1 (2), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for expenses related  to debris removal associated with
the 2020 wildfire season, is increased by $25,000,000.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for the bridge program, is increased by $3,636,767 for
the Interstate Bridge Replacement program.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for driver and  motor vehicle services, is increased by
$5,248,462.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources  Office, is increased by $1,669,855 to address the increased costs
of statewide training expenses and to support newly independent state agencies.
SECTION 46.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Enterprise Goods and Services Division,  is increased by $2,127,233 to address staffing
needs associated with  the out-of-state workforce, the modernization of the electronic pro-
curement system and the establishment of newly independent state agencies.
SECTION 47.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Secretary of State, is increased  by $4,558,640 for the Oregon Centralized
Voter Registration system replacement project.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Secretary of State, for the Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is increased by $964,248, for server room upgrades and position actions.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 6
funds, collected or received by  the Secretary of State, for the Corporation Division, is in-
creased by $694,248, to accommodate increased bank card transaction and service fees.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (2), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses, other than expenses
described in sections 6 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, from fees, moneys  or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds, corporate activity
tax funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education,  for op-
erations, is increased by $376,967 for expenditures from the Vision Health Account.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (4), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds,  corporate activity tax funds and federal funds, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of  Education for programs other than those specified in sections
5 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  all other grants, is increased by $1,123,033 for
expenditures from the Vision Health Account.
SECTION 52.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 12 (4), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS 327.250, for all other grants, is decreased by $1,503,000 to
fulfill the obligations for the American Indian/Alaska Native Student Success Plan.
SECTION 53.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 13, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of Educa-
tion from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under  ORS 327.250, for
operations, is increased by $1,503,000 to fulfill the  obligations for the American Indian/Alaska
Native Student Success Plan.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 12 (3), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS  327.250, for statewide equity initiatives, is decreased by
$643,464 to  fulfill the obligations for the African American/Black Student Success Plan and
Safe and Inclusive Schools Program.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 13, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of Educa-
tion from the Statewide  Education Initiatives Account established under ORS 327.250, for
operations, is increased by  $643,464 to fulfill the obligations for the African American/Black
Student Success Plan and Safe and Inclusive Schools Program.
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter 660, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds and funds described in sections 8 to 12, chapter 660, Oregon Laws  2021, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $3,812,707 for the Oregon Teacher Scholars Program.
SECTION 57.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 6 (1), chapter 660, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 7
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described  in sections 8 to 12, chapter 660, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $1,000,000 for Educator Equity Plan Grants.
SECTION 58.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$750,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred  to the Department of Human Services, for grants au-
thorized under section 74, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 469, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal Older Americans Act  funds
received from the Department of Human Services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 469, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by the
Long Term Care Ombudsman, is increased by $258,160 for expenditure of a  one-time federal
funds transfer from the Department of Human Services  to respond to the COVID-19
pandemic.
SECTION 60.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 469, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal Older Americans Act  funds
received from the Department of Human Services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 469, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by the
Long Term Care Ombudsman, is  increased by $6,000 to allow the agency to use donations
received in support of the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator program.
SECTION 61.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for operations and health services, is increased by
$6,000,000 to shift costs for repair and maintenance projects.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations and health services,  is decreased by
$131,200 to shift costs for the library services unit.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (2), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central administration and administrative services,
is decreased by $6,000,000 to shift costs for repair and maintenance projects.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (3), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for correctional services, is increased  by $131,200 to shift
costs for the library services unit.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Corrections, for central administration and
administrative services, is decreased by $100,000, to shift  costs for the community partner
outreach program.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 8
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Corrections, for correctional services,  is
increased by $100,000, to shift costs for the community partner outreach program.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,250,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Justice from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Justice,  for crime victims and
survivor services, for grants authorized under section 74, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the General Counsel Division,
is decreased by $447,784 for the Fair Housing Enforcement initiative.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is increased by $447,784 for the Fair Housing Enforcement initiative.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 10,  chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the defense of criminal convictions, is decreased  by
$212,656.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $52,430
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice,
for debt service and related costs.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (3), chapter 662, Oregon  Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for emergency management, is decreased by $269,505 to
shift information technology costs between programs.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (1), chapter 662, Oregon  Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for administration, is increased by $269,505 to  shift in-
formation technology costs between programs.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,137,980 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth
Authority, for debt service.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Judicial Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Judicial  Department, for grants authorized un-
der section 74, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 57, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 9
June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial Department
from the Oregon  Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund for the cost of
issuing general obligation bonds for the Supreme Court building renovation,  is decreased by
$250,000.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or  received by the Judicial Department, for op-
erations, is increased by $250,000 for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds for the  Su-
preme Court building renovation.
SECTION 78.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$274,570 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Judicial Depart-
ment, for debt service.
SECTION 79. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for planning associated with  the replacement of the Benton
County Courthouse.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability by section 1 (1), chapter 167,
Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for administration, is increased
by $15,000.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by section 3 (5),  chapter 560, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated
from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department, for infrastructure, is increased by $283,034, for the payment of
contractually obligated commitments related to the Columbia Corridor Drainage project.
SECTION 82.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $89,479 for a  Confederated Tribes of the Warm
Springs Reservation wastewater system improvement project.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$287,800 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department from American Res-
cue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund moneys received by the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Business  Development
Department, for business, innovation, and trade, for the Rural Broadband  Capacity Program.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,940,041 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business  Development Department from the Tide Gate
Grant and Loan Fund established by section 21, chapter 10,  Oregon Laws 2020 (second special
session), for the provision of grants and loans and  other related supporting or administrative
functions as allowed by statute.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter 556, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased by $46,644.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 5, chapter 556, Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 10
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for debt service for bond-related activities,
is decreased by $46,644.
SECTION 87.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (7), chapter 503, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Building Codes Division, is decreased by $244,807.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 503, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, for the Building
Codes Division, is increased by $244,807.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 558, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of administrative expenses by the
Bureau of Labor and Industries from the Wage Security Fund, is decreased by $1,836,757.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 558, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries, is increased by $1,836,757.
SECTION 91.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Mental Health Regulatory  Agency by section 266, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for a demographic study of licensees and  a diversity
plan, is decreased by $300,000.
SECTION 92. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $150,000, for a de-
mographic study of licensees and a diversity plan.
SECTION 93. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Board of Psychology, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $150,000, for  a demographic study of licensees and a diversity
plan.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1,  chapter 432, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, is increased by $25,000 for increases in costs for audit
services, central services, wages and employee insurance benefits.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife from American Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the  Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and transferred to the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife, for deposit into  the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund established by ORS
496.252, for outdoor recreation stimulus.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the State Marine Board from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the State Marine Board for grants  authorized under
section 74, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 11
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Department of Aviation, for operations, is increased by
$633,162, for COVID-19 related costs.
SECTION 98.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5)(b), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State  Chief Information Officer - State Data Center, for pass-through ex-
penditures, is decreased by $15,198,354.
SECTION 99.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5)(c), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services Office,
for the Office of the State Chief Information Officer - State Data  Center, for equipment
lifecycle replacement, is increased by $15,198,354.
SECTION 100.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (15), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
special governmental payments, is decreased by $6,394,311.
SECTION 101.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,394,311 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for  special payments from proceeds of previously
issued bonds.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 308, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts other than those described in section 3, chapter
308, Oregon Laws 2021, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received
by the State Library, is increased by $183,025.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 308, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from moneys received from
the assessment  against state agencies described in ORS 357.203 and transferred to the Mis-
cellaneous Receipts Account for the State Library, is decreased by $183,025.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 140, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Legislative Administration Committee, for  the cost of is-
suing general obligation bonds and project costs for the Document  Publishing and Manage-
ment System, is increased by $4,205,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 12
SECTION 105. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,604,932, for the Office of the  Attorney General and Admin-
istration, for the Legal Tools Replacement information technology project.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Justice, for the Office of the Attorney General and Administration, for the Legal Tools  Re-
placement information technology project.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$105,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Justice, for debt service and related costs,  for the cost of issuing bonds for the Legal Tools
Replacement information technology project.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (1), chapter 662, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for administration, is increased by $274,367 for
fund split adjustments on positions.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  662, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in this section, col-
lected or received by the Oregon  Military Department, for administration, is increased by
$243,306 for fund split adjustments on positions.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  662, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Oregon Military Department, for administration, is decreased by  $517,673, for fund
split adjustments on positions.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section  1, chapter
429, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased by $74,000 for
electronic records management.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section 1, chapter
429, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased  by $115,971 for
information technology support.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section  1, chapter
429, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased by $537,464 for
an increase in release hearing workload.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of the  State Fire Marshal, is increased by $1,149,500 for wildland
firefighting equipment purchases.
SECTION 115.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021,
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 13
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of the State  Fire Marshal, is decreased by $50,000, for implementation
of the provisions of chapter 540, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 116.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of the State Fire  Marshal, is increased by $50,000 for the purchase
of protective respirator masks.
SECTION 117.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 381, Oregon Laws 2021, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, is increased by $232,043 for the Assistance to  Firefighters
Grants Program.
SECTION 118.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $337,000 for grand jury
recordation.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations,  is increased by $113,700 for Oregon Tax
Court caseload growth.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $3,912,320 for the pretrial
release program under chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  60, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse  Capital Construction and Improvement Fund for the
project costs of, and cost of  issuing general obligation bonds for, the Clackamas County
Courthouse is increased by $95,399,999.
SECTION 122. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $12,806,640, for the  Trial Criminal Division, for the
procurement of trial-level legal services for unrepresented clients.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 560,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for the Arts
and Cultural Trust, is increased by $1,680,000, for the provision of grants for artist resilience
and county cultural coalitions.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (4), chapter  560, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Department, for arts, is increased
by $803,500,  for the administration and distribution of funding provided by the National
Endowment for the Arts for the support of art programs.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  560, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 14
Business Development Department, for business, innovation, and trade, is  increased by
$641,475, for increased program staffing.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon  Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $52,500,000 to provide financial assistance to aid in the acquisition, renovation or mainte-
nance of  properties with project-based federal rental assistance contracts, public housing
undergoing significant recapitalization or publicly supported housing as defined  in ORS
456.250, or to preserve the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $30,000,000 for funding for loans to purchasers of land upon which affordable housing  will
be developed.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon  Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $5,000,000 for funding for loans to purchasers of naturally occurring affordable housing
stock.
SECTION 129.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $5,000,000 for down payment assistance to borrowers who utilize mortgage lending  pro-
grams offered by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon  Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $4,200,000 for loans related to the acquisition of manufactured home parks.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 15
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon  Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $2,800,000 for loans related to the decommissioning, disposal and replacement of manu-
factured housing units.
SECTION 132.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in sections 2  and 6, chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Housing and Community Services  Department, is increased by $221,389,595 for Emer-
gency Rental Assistance program expenditures.
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (6), chapter  640, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission, for capital im-
provements, is increased by $210,000 for sewer line replacement.
SECTION 134. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Energy by section 110, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for debt service for the Small Scale Local Energy
Project Loan Program, is decreased by $3,500,000.
SECTION 135.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000, for deposit into the Small Scale Local Energy Project
Administration and Bond Sinking Fund established by ORS 470.300, for the payment of debt
service for the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Program.
SECTION 136.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,500,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department of Energy, for the payment of  debt service for
the Small Scale Local Energy  Project Loan Program, from the Small Scale Local Energy
Project Administration and Bond Sinking Fund established by ORS 470.300.
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for agency management, is increased by
$484,553 for information technology costs related to the State Data Center.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  428, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the State Marine Board,  for administration and education, is in-
creased by $50,000 for the Abandoned and Derelict Vessels program.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Water Resources Department by section 23a, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2021
(second special session), for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for deposit into the Water
Well Abandonment,  Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS 537.766, is decreased
by $435,994.
SECTION 140. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $435,994, for positions and other  associated costs of ad-
ministration of  the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by
ORS 537.766.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 665,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 16
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United States  Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the  Bonneville Power Administration and the National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 665,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is decreased by $435,994 for authorized expenditures of moneys  de-
posited in  the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS
537.766.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5, chapter  680, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board from  lottery moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Oper-
ating Fund established under ORS 541.945, for operating expenses, activities and projects to
implement Article XV, section  4b, of the Oregon Constitution, is increased by $169,937, for
monitoring and reporting conservation outcomes.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 151 (2), chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Transportation from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund
moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred  to
the Department of Transportation, for Lake County for  rehabilitation of the Lake County
Railroad, is decreased by $3,349,960.
SECTION 144.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount  of $3,349,960 for Lake County for rehabilitation of the Lake
County Railroad.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Secretary of State, for the Archives Division, is increased
by $120,876 for preservation of legislative records.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of  State by section 1 (2), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Elections Division, is increased by $327,122 for position
costs.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 35 (1), chapter 669, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation for the implementation of pretrial release under
chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2021, is decreased by $2,500,000.
SECTION 148. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $5,125,000, to be allocated to the Department of Justice, for  the
Division of Child Support, for the Child Enforcement Automated System.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central services, is decreased by $368,453.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 17
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased by $43,210,129.
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  central services, is increased by
$9,428,888.
SECTION 152. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $13,799,021.
SECTION 153. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$37,585.
SECTION 154.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $6,995,612.
SECTION 155. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $2,577,977.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for vocational  rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $17,246,186.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased by
$5,125,710.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 18
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $1,489,529.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $13,492,484.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for child welfare programs, is decreased by
$5,445,274.
SECTION 161. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is decreased by $3,503,255.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$1,967,891.
SECTION 163.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is decreased by $54,943,191.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by
$62,104,539.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is decreased by $117,223,088.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 19
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for intellectual/developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $13,902,861.
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased
by $3,246,354.
SECTION 168. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $61,112,446.
SECTION 169.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for child welfare  programs, is increased by
$10,961,922 for position costs.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by  $45,474 for position
costs.
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$4,654,665 for position costs.
SECTION 172.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central  services, is increased by $4,438,678
for child welfare-related position costs.
SECTION 173. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased by  $132,774 for child welfare-
related position costs.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 20
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  central services, is increased by
$4,379,008 for child welfare-related position costs.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $785,512 for  child welfare-
related position costs.
SECTION 176. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $459,080 for child welfare-related position costs.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$44,040 for child welfare-related position costs.
SECTION 178.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $439,949 for child welfare-related position costs.
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$4,432,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Human Services,  for aging and
people with disabilities programs, for a one-time  retention incentive payment for eligible
nursing facility staff.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,347,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred  to the Department of Human Services, for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, for a one-time retention incentive payment
for eligible group home staff.
SECTION 181.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for intellectual/developmental disabilities pro-
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 21
grams, is increased by $1,525,311 for a negotiated temporary COVID-19 incentive  payment to
eligible Stabilization and Crisis Unit staff.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased  by $2,320,172 for a negotiated temporary COVID-19 incentive payment
to eligible Stabilization and Crisis Unit staff.
SECTION 183.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is  increased by $183,765,468 for the expenditure of enhanced federal funds for home
and community-based services.
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $251,804,609 for the expenditure of enhanced federal funds for home
and community-based services.
SECTION 185.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central  services, is increased by $9,200,000
for contracts or programs to help meet staffing shortages.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  62, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse  Capital Construction and Improvement Fund for the
project costs of,  and cost of issuing general obligation bonds for, the Crook County Court-
house, is increased by $4,445,000.
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 63, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and  Improvement Fund for local
matching funds for the Crook County Courthouse is increased by $4,416,705.
SECTION 188. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $743,588, for the Administrative Services Division,
for the planning phase of a financial and case management information technology system.
SECTION 189. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  560, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is increased by $1,000,000, for economic development and recovery activ-
ities.
SECTION 190.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$90,660 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses by the Land Conservation and Development Commission from the City
Economic Development Pilot Program Fund established by ORS 197A.413.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 22
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$250,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Parks and Recreation Department from American  Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the  Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and  transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Depart-
ment, for grants authorized under section 74, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4),  chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Business Division, is  increased by $326,344 for
the administration and enforcement of ORS 475A.658 to 475A.714.
SECTION 193. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Employees Retirement System, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $17,250,000, to be deposited in the Employer Incentive
Fund established under section 1, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  145, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
by the Public Employees Retirement System from the Employer Incentive Fund, is  increased
by $17,249,999, for state matching funds.
SECTION 195.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 145, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to the Public
Employees Retirement System for the Employer Incentive Fund, is increased  by $2,669,467,
for state matching funds.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 606, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  allocation to the Department of Human Services for po-
sitions to reduce the  number of double-fill positions associated with the child welfare pro-
gram, is decreased by $15,859,656.
SECTION 197. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and  analytics, and
public health, is increased by $1,416,269 for  administration of a statewide coordinated crisis
system.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs,  is increased by $354,921 for administration of a statewide coordinated
crisis system.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems,  health policy and
analytics, and public health, is increased by $20,285 for administration of a statewide coordi-
nated crisis system.
SECTION 200.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 23
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for central services, state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased  by $42,574 for administration of a statewide coordi-
nated crisis system.
SECTION 201. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $160,641 for administration of  a statewide coordinated crisis
system.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $173,704 for administration of a statewide  coordinated
crisis system.
SECTION 203.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $30,263,630  for the expenditure of enhanced federal funds for
home and community-based services.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and  analytics, and
public health, is increased by $5,400,000 for expanding citizenship waived medical services.
SECTION 205. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $8,800,000 for expanding citizenship waived medical services.
SECTION 206. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$12,400,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Health Authority from Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and
Economic Security Act Coronavirus Relief  Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services and  transferred to the Oregon Health Authority, for COVID-19
pandemic response activities and behavioral health workforce incentives.
SECTION 207.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $397,478 for health equity program and data support.
SECTION 208. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, state assessments and
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 24
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $3,417,283 for  human resources program capacity and
the transfer of funds between programs for health equity data support.
SECTION 209. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for central services, state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $348,439 for human resources program capacity.
SECTION 210. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $615,537 for  health equity program and data support and injury
and violence prevention program capacity.
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is  increased by $283,586 for human resources program capacity and the
transfer of funds between programs for health equity data support.
SECTION 212.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (4), chapter  603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Education for programs other than  those specified in sections
5 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  all other grants, is increased by $26,058,151 for
the High School Success and College and Career Readiness Program.
SECTION 213.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  19, chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Early Childhood Suspension and Expulsion
Prevention Program, is decreased by $5,800,000.
SECTION 214.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $2,023,083 for the Early
Childhood Suspension and Expulsion Prevention Program.
SECTION 215.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (5), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for  program costs
and to purchase services,  for other early learning programs, is increased by $3,776,917 for the
Early Childhood Suspension and Expulsion Prevention Program.
SECTION 216. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $314,528, for the Criminal Justice Division, to  implement
chapter 541, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department  by section 5, chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $51,710 for the Council on Court Procedures.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 25
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (5),  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for debt service, is decreased by $10,249.
SECTION 219. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is  increased by $61,959 for general opera-
tional expenses.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$398,139 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services, for the Chief Human Resources Office to expand
Workday functionality.
SECTION 221. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000  for Enterprise Asset Management
to purchase vehicles for agency use and to cover increased fuel and maintenance costs.
SECTION 222. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter  425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
Enterprise Asset Management,  is increased by $3,400,000 to purchase vehicles for agency use
and to cover increased fuel and maintenance costs.
SECTION 223.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,345,000 for  Enterprise Information Ser-
vices to support Microsoft 365 maintenance and operations.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$26,323,860 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services for Enterprise Information Services to  support
broadband investments and cybersecurity modernization.
SECTION 225. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $11,250,000, for crime victim  and survivor services, for supple-
mental funding of the federal Victims of Crime Act grants.
SECTION 226. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for crime victim and survivor services, for deposit
into the Oregon Domestic and Sexual Violence Services  Fund established under ORS 147.453.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for crime victim and survivor
services, is increased by $10,000,000, for the Oregon  Domestic and Sexual Violence Services
Fund established under ORS 147.453.
SECTION 228. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$15,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 26
payment of expenses by the Department of Justice,  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Justice, for crime victim and
survivor services, for community violence prevention grants.
SECTION 229.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 662, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for emergency management, is decreased by
$8,654,366, for the establishment of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 230. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (5), chapter 662, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for debt service,  is decreased by $1,576,705, for
the establishment of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 231. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 662,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2021, collected  or received by the Oregon Military Department, for emer-
gency management, is decreased by $74,495,733, for the  establishment of the Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management.
SECTION 232.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 662,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the  Oregon Military Department, for emergency management, is decreased by
$702,235,504, for the establishment of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 233. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $7,896,756, for administration.
SECTION 234. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$484,877 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for administration.
SECTION 235.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$68,337,111 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for the 9-1-1 emergency program.
SECTION 236.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $757,611, for preparedness and response.
SECTION 237. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,673,745 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for preparedness and response.
SECTION 238.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$37,092,457 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 27
payment of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in section 237  of this
2022 Act, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for
preparedness and response.
NOTE:
 Section 239 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 240. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$665,143,048 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from federal funds, other than those described in section 237 of this
2022 Act, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for
mitigation and recovery.
SECTION 241.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,576,705, for debt service.
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 159, chapter 539, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to the Department of State  Police for preparing
the office of the State Fire Marshal as a separate state agency, is decreased by $1,807,561.
SECTION 243. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by  $1,807,561 for preparing
the office of the State Fire Marshal as a separate state agency.
SECTION 244.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$7,368,864 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Housing and Community
Services Department for activities and capacity associated  with disaster recovery and
resiliency.
SECTION 245. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 4, Oregon  Laws 2021 (second special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses
by the Housing and Community Services Department from American Rescue Plan  Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Housing and Community Services Department
for a grant to Home Forward for distributions to compensate landlords pursuant to section
9, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, is decreased by $10,000,000.
SECTION 246. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for a grant to  Home Forward for
distributions to compensate landlords pursuant to section 9, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 247. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  556,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $100,000,000.
SECTION 248. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $165,000,000, for deposit into the General
Housing Account created by ORS 458.620, to provide financial assistance to aid  in the acqui-
sition, renovation or maintenance of  properties with project-based federal rental assistance
contracts, of public housing undergoing significant recapitalization or of publicly supported
housing as defined in ORS 456.250,  or to preserve the affordability of manufactured dwelling
parks.
SECTION 249.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department  by section 273, chapter 669,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for funding  for loans to purchasers
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 28
of naturally occurring affordable housing stock or land  upon which affordable housing will
be developed, is decreased by $30,000,000.
SECTION 250. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $40,000,000 for deposit into the Housing
Acquisition Fund established under section 9,  chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, for funding for
loans to purchasers of naturally  occurring affordable housing stock or land upon which af-
fordable housing will be developed.
SECTION 251.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries  by section 1, chapter 558, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased by $2,006,730 for Portland office re-
location expenses.
SECTION 252. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter 558, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased by $173,164 for wage claims and
complaints processing.
SECTION 253.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, out
of the General Fund,  the amount of $180,000, for the purposes of regulation and enforcement
relating to animal rescue entities, as defined in ORS 609.415.
SECTION 254. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for air quality, is increased by $95,046 for
laboratory operations.
SECTION 255. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  water quality, is increased by $411,538
for laboratory operations.
SECTION 256. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for land quality, is increased by $10,416 for
laboratory operations.
SECTION 257. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Emergency Board by section 1a, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to state agencies for state employee compen-
sation changes, is decreased by $198,000,000.
SECTION 258.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and  analytics, and
public health, is decreased by $159,461,249 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 259. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Oregon State Hospital, is decreased by
$2,525,518 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 260.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $18,230,180 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 29
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and
analytics, and public health, is increased by $1,041,724,695 for rebalancing  the agency’s
budget.
SECTION 262. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for central services, state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by $2,649,904 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 263. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $8,891,780 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 264. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for health systems  and health policy and analytics, is decreased by $200,000
for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 265.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for central services, state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs, is in-
creased by $200,000 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 266.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $732,693,078 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 267. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased  by
$1,560,378 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 268. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $7,208,052 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 30
SECTION 269. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7, chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Public Employees’
Benefit Board from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums  and
self-insurance, is increased by $7,200,000 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 270. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8, chapter 668, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board  from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and
self-insurance, is increased by $7,200,000 for rebalancing the agency’s budget.
SECTION 271. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $983,411  for financial, internal auditing and information
services.
SECTION 272. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for central services, state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $159,031 for financial, internal auditing and infor-
mation services.
SECTION 273.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  shared administrative services, is
increased by $1,705,716 for financial, internal auditing and information services.
SECTION 274. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $273,890 for financial,  internal auditing and information ser-
vices.
SECTION 275. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by
$10,810,943 for maintaining appropriate staffing levels.
SECTION 276. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 11 (1), chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to the  Oregon Health Authority for maintaining
appropriate staffing levels at the Oregon State Hospital, is decreased by $10,810,943.
SECTION 277. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (6), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Division  of Child Support, is decreased by $213,517,
for a child support receipting and payment services vendor contract.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 31
SECTION 278. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Justice, for the Division of Child Support,
is decreased by $37,146, for a child  support receipting and payment services vendor contract.
SECTION 279. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter  427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Division of Child Support,  is de-
creased by $486,565, for a child support receipting and payment services vendor contract.
SECTION 280. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$1,005,329 for families experiencing low or no income.
SECTION 281. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $25,101,484 for families experiencing low or no income.
SECTION 282. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $1,239,601 for financial, internal audit, and information services.
SECTION 283. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  de-
scribed in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon  Laws 2021, collected or received by the Department
of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by  $59,343
for financial, internal audit, and information services.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $719,075 for financial, internal audit, and information services.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the  Child Care Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon  Laws 2021, collected or received by the Department
of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $1,150,607 for financial, internal au-
dit, and information services.
SECTION 286.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out  of the
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 32
General Fund, the amount of $121,000,000 to ensure that financial obligations to the  Common
School Fund related to the Elliott State Forest are satisfied.
SECTION 287. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Office of the Governor for the Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advance-
ment by section 2, chapter 594, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is
decreased by $1,376,037 for transfer of the Office of Immigrant  and Refugee Advancement to
the Department of Human Services.
SECTION 288.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for central services, is increased by $1,376,037,
for transfer of the Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advancement to the Department  of
Human Services.
SECTION 289. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Office  of the Governor by section 1, chapter 434, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2023, is increased by $199,106 for a corrections gender-
responsive coordinator.
SECTION 290. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations and  health services, is increased by
$51,421 for assessing gender-responsive practices in correctional settings.
SECTION 291. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Police, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,600,000, for  the purpose of funding the Firearms Instant
Check System unit.
SECTION 292. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  administrative services, agency support and
criminal justice information services, is increased by $112,291 for a tribal relations liaison.
SECTION 293.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for the  Deschutes County Circuit Court renovation and ex-
pansion.
SECTION 294. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount  of $2,000,000, for the Columbia County Courthouse life safety and accessi-
bility improvements.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 206, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Business
Development Department from American Rescue Plan Act Capital Projects Fund  moneys
received by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and deposited in the
Broadband Fund established by section 4, chapter  17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special ses-
sion), is increased by $36,795,418.
SECTION 296.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $600,000, for the purpose of completing com-
prehensive emerging sector market  analyses on organic agriculture and organic products,
cannabis, commercial music, ocean resources and the blue economy, and live performance.
SECTION 297. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $984,000, for distribution to the City of St.
Helens for a Central Waterfront Redevelopment project.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 33
SECTION 298. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June  30,
2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $2,000,000 for distribution to the Portland
Japanese Garden for the Japan Institute.
SECTION 299. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $15,000,000, for distribution to the Oregon
International Port of Coos Bay for the Coos Bay Channel Modification Project.
SECTION 300. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  503, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for Oregon
OSHA, is increased by $2,900,000, for COVID-19 related costs.
SECTION 301.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  673, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for land quality, is increased by  $56,604, for administration of a mattress
stewardship program.
SECTION 302. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $239,000,  for administrative costs associated with the
distribution of funding and management of programs addressing drought conditions.
SECTION 303. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $5,203,786, for a program to distribute grants for
certain natural resource recovery actions in areas affected by 2021 fires.
SECTION 304. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in  the Flexible Incentives
Account established under ORS 541.937, for the purpose of  funding a program providing
grants in support of voluntary water acquisitions.
SECTION 305. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed  Enhancement Board from the Flexible In-
centives Account established under ORS 541.937, for a  program providing grants in support
of voluntary water acquisitions.
SECTION 306. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit in the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978, for the uses described in ORS 541.979.
SECTION 307. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$5,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from  the Oregon Agri-
cultural Heritage Fund established  under ORS 541.978, for the purposes described in ORS
541.979.
SECTION 308. The allocation made by  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to the
State Department of Agriculture under section 3, chapter 680, Oregon Laws  2021, from
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 34
moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS
541.945, for activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the Oregon Con-
stitution, is increased by $1,213,188.
SECTION 309. The allocation made by  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to the
Department of State Police under  section 1, chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2021, from moneys
deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS 541.945,
for fish and wildlife activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the
Oregon Constitution, is increased by $249,144.
SECTION 310. The allocation made by  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife under section 2, chapter 680, Oregon Laws  2021, from
moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating  Fund established under ORS
541.945, for activities and projects to  implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Con-
stitution, is increased by $118,337.
SECTION 311. The allocation made by  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to the
Department of Environmental Quality under section 4, chapter 680, Oregon Laws  2021, from
moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS
541.945, for activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the Oregon Con-
stitution, is increased by $224,550.
SECTION 312. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, to be allocated to the State Forestry  Department for
cash flow needs.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
NOTE: Section 313 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 314. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $7,500,000 for the Strong Start Program.
SECTION 315. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for statewide public services,  is
increased by $1,000,000 to support the Oregon  State University Extension Service Oregon Bee
Project.
SECTION 316. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $700,000 to  support the expansion of the University of Oregon
College of Education’s Oregon Child Abuse Prevalence Study.
SECTION 317. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for Oregon Health and Science
University education and other programs,  is increased by $45,000,000 to support expanded
capacity for health care education  and pathway programs and to provide tuition assistance
and loan repayment to learners from underrepresented communities.
SECTION 318. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for operations and health services is decreased by
$74,716,564.
SECTION 319. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  95, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 35
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Corrections from Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic  Security Act Coronavirus Relief
Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred
to the Department of Corrections, for the purpose of  expenditures and activities to respond
to the COVID-19 public health emergency, is increased by $74,716,564.
SECTION 320. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,750,000, for crime victim and  survivor services for grants to
court appointed special advocate programs.
SECTION 321. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June  30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $835,000, for distribution to the Crescent San-
itary District for the retirement of debt related to its sewer collection  and treatment system
project.
SECTION 322. Section 196, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 196.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts are es-
tablished for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses
by the Oregon Business Development Department, from American Rescue Plan Act  Coronavirus
State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services
and transferred to the Oregon Business Development Department, for infrastructure,  for grants to
the following entities, for the following purposes:
(1) City of Mill City - Storm
Drainage Improvements ................... $ 2,923,500
(2) Hood River Waterfront
Stormwater Line ................................ $ 2,694,953
(3) City of Elgin Wastewater
Collection System .............................. $ 2,640,125
(4) City of Sandy Wastewater
[Treatment Plant ................................ $ 14,700,000]
System Improvements .............. $ 14,700,000
(5) Marion County - North
Santiam Septic to Sewer ................. $ 50,000,000
(6) City of Turner - Water
Pipe Project ........................................$ 3,000,000
(7) City of Vale - Wastewater
Treatment Facility Headworks
Improvements ..................................... $ 100,000
(8) City of Astoria - 16th St.
Distribution Waterline
Replacement .......................................$ 2,790,000
(9) City of Astoria - Pipeline
Road Waterline Resilience .............. $ 2,930,000
(10) City of Clatskanie - Waste
Water Treatment Plant .................... $ 10,000,000
(11) Lyons-Mehama Water District ....... $ 5,260,000
(12) Port of Toledo - Sanitary
Sewer Extension to Hwy 20 ........... $ 2,425,798
(13) City of Waldport - Water
Tank Project ......................................$ 974,850
(14) Arch Cape Domestic Water
Supply District - Arch Cape
Forest Project .................................... $ 2,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 36
(15) City of Astoria - Wastewater
Treatment Plant Headworks
Improvement Project ........................ $ 4,860,000
(16) City of Echo - Water
System Improvements ....................... $ 5,530,000
(17) City of Echo - Waste
Water System Improvements .......... $ 1,500,000
(18) City of Aurora -
Wastewater Treatment
Plant Facility ..................................... $ 10,545,543
(19) City of Aurora - Water
Storage Tank and Pump Station ... $ 4,284,203
(20) Crane Union School District
1J - Crane Community Water
and Sewer System ............................. $ 3,200,000
(21) City of Arlington - Columbia
River Municipal Pump Station ...... $ 250,000
(22) City of Arlington - Wastewater
Facilities Plan .................................... $ 65,000
(23) City of Tillamook - Water
Transmission Line Replacement .... $ 12,000,000
(24) Mapleton Water District -
Infrastructure project ...................... $ 1,140,000
(25) City of Lakeside - New
Wastewater Treatment Plant ......... $ 14,628,685
(26) City of Scappoose - New
Headworks and Grit Chamber,
Basalt Well, 2M Gal Keys
Road Reservoir, Miller WTP
Repair, Smith Road Pump
Station .................................................$ 10,000,000
(27) City of Aumsville - Water
System Improvements ....................... $ 2,500,000
(28) City of Philomath - Water
Treatment Plant and
Reservoir Construction .................... $ 12,000,000
(29) Wasco County Soil and Water
Conservation District -
Mosier Million #2 ............................. $ 900,000
[(30) Crescent Sanitary District ................ $ 835,000]
(30) Crescent Sanitary District ........ $ 0
(31) City of Carlton -
Wastewater Treatment Plant ......... $ 5,800,000
(32) Lane County - McKenzie River
Valley Drinking Water and
Wastewater System
Replacements ......................................$ 15,500,000
(33) Panther Creek Water District
- Water Reservoir Replacement ..... $ 1,800,000
(34) Lincoln County - Panther
[Creek Septic/Stormwater ................. $ 15,000,000]
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 37
Creek Septic/Stormwater .......... $ 4,000,000
(35) City of Detroit - Drinking
Water System ..................................... $ 3,000,000
(36) City of Ashland - Talent-
Ashland-Phoenix (TAP)
Intertie Improvements ...................... $ 3,000,000
(37) Lincoln County -
Well Repair .........................................$ 500,000
(38) City of Gates - Water Meter
Replacement .......................................$ 25,000
(39) City of Phoenix - Charlotte
Ann Water District Disbanding
Transition Costs ................................ $ 5,000,000
(40) City of Powers - Sewer
Collection System and
Sewer Plant ........................................$ 3,000,000
(41) City of Roseburg -
Storm Improvements ......................... $ 1,570,064
(42) Cave Junction - Water
Distribution Center ........................... $ 200,000
(43) City of Mosier - Waste
Water Treatment Plan Update ...... $ 2,500,000
(44) City of Nyssa - Water
Expansion ............................................$ 3,000,000
(45) City of Medford - SW Medford
Water and Sewer Infrastructure ... $ 2,700,000
(46) City of Redmond - Skyline
Village Affordable Housing
Sewer ...................................................$ 950,000
(47) City of Corvallis - Rock
Creek Transmission Main ............... $ 10,500,000
(48) Lakeview - Water Treatment
Facility ................................................$ 15,000,000
(49) Panther Creek Water
District - Regional Drinking
Water Quality Improvements ... $ 11,000,000
SECTION 323.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $120,000,000, for distribution  to the Portland
Public Schools District for the relocation of the Harriet Tubman Middle School.
SECTION 324. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $65,000,000, for distribution to Oregon
Worker Relief for pandemic relief.
SECTION 325.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for assessing  gender-responsive
practices in correctional settings.
SECTION 326. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 289, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $97,592,219.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 38
SECTION 327. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 289, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the Department of
Education for the State School Fund, is increased by $60,982,219.
SECTION 328. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 289, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Edu-
cation for the State School Fund from the Fund for Student  Success established under ORS
327.001, is increased by $36,610,000.
SECTION 329. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $3,228,818 for estab-
lishing the Department of Early Learning and Care.
SECTION 330. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $3,609,588 for estab-
lishing the Department of Early Learning and Care.
SECTION 331. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (5), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for program costs
and to purchase services, for other early learning programs, is increased by $2,000,000 for
Relief Nurseries.
SECTION 332.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (3), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for  program costs
and to purchase services, for other K-12 grant-in-aid programs,  is increased by $237,389 for
development of a Native Hawaiian/Pacific Islander student achievement plan.
SECTION 333. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (3), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for program costs
and to purchase services, for other  K-12 grant-in-aid programs, is increased by $5,000,000 for
grants through the African American/Black Student Success program.
SECTION 334. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for distribution to Harmony
Academy for program capacity, student transportation and development of  a statewide plan
for expansion.
SECTION 335. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $21,000,000, for distribution to  Portland State University to fund
$500 recruitment and retention payments to child care providers  working in Oregon through
the Oregon Center for Career Development in Childhood Care and Education.
SECTION 336. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,334,200, for distribution to the Oregon State Bar Association for
OregonLaw+Connect.
SECTION 337.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 225, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 39
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for issuance
costs of bonds issued under Article XI-Q of  the Oregon Constitution for the purpose of ac-
quiring land and construction of an agency warehouse distribution center and headquarters
facilities, is increased by $792,217.
SECTION 338. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 226, chapter 669, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for costs of
bond issuance and expenses associated with distribution center management  information
technology systems, is decreased by $30,000.
SECTION 339.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 227, chapter 669, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for issuance
costs of bonds issued  under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for an automated dis-
tribution center conveyor and order fulfillment system, is increased by $30,000.
SECTION 340. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 228, chapter 669, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for debt service,
is decreased by $3,117,526.
SECTION 341. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries  by section 1, chapter 558, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, is increased by $684,500 for addressing age dis-
crimination in the workplace.
SECTION 342. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Transportation, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $7,000,000,  for deposit into a subaccount of the Oregon
Transportation Infrastructure Fund established under ORS 367.015,  for the purpose of fund-
ing projects that reduce the number  of wildlife-vehicle collisions and improve habitat
connectivity for wildlife.
SECTION 343. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $22,000,000, for distribution to Seeding
Justice for a child care capacity building grant program.
SECTION 344. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $7,897,000, for distribution to United  We
Heal Training for programs to support the expansion of child care services statewide.
SECTION 345. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,200,000, for distribution to Euvalcree to
renovate the Euvalcree Center and to provide initial operating costs and  support for new
in-home child care providers.
SECTION 346. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $8,228,100, for distribution to
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 40
NeighborImpact to fund new locations for and expansion of child care businesses in  central
Oregon.
SECTION 347. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Office of the Governor by section 1, chapter 434,  Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is increased  by $365,928 to fund the statutorily required
Corrections Ombudsman in the Office of the Governor.
SECTION 348. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 169 (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws  2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to the Department of Education and the
proposed Department of Early Learning and Care for the establishment of a new  agency, is
decreased by $3,228,818.
SECTION 349. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$4,000,000 for emergency food supply stabilization and 2-1-1 information services.
SECTION 350. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for child welfare  programs, is increased by
$250,000 to contract for  technical assistance with development of culturally-responsive and
evidence-based treatment foster care.
SECTION 351. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  556,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  is increased by $50,000,000 to ad-
dress cost increases  impacting affordable housing developments that received funding awards
from the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 352. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $35,000,000 for  deposit into the General
Housing Account established by ORS 458.620, for small affordable rental  housing project de-
velopments.
SECTION 353. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000 for  acquisition of manufactured
housing park properties that are at risk of sale or closure.
SECTION 354. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000 for development  of affordable
homes for purchase.
SECTION 355. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for distribution to
homeownership centers, community dispute resolution centers, non-profits and other  or-
ganizations that serve low-income homeowners.
SECTION 356.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $500,000 for homelessness policy and coor-
dination efforts.
SECTION 357. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $80,000,000 for homelessness response and
prevention services delivered through agency programs and community partners.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 41
SECTION 358. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the  period beginning on the effective date of this
2022 Act and ending January 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $99,714,661 for
grants to school districts  and education service districts for summer learning and
enrichment programs for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
SECTION 359. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the  period beginning on the effective date of this
2022 Act and  ending January 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $285,339 for the
staffing and other administrative costs of administering the Summer Learning Program.
SECTION 360. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the  period beginning on the effective date of this
2022 Act and ending January 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000 for
a grant to the Oregon Association of Education Service Districts, through their named  fiscal
agent, for summer enrichment programs for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
SECTION 361. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (5), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for  program costs
and to purchase services, for other early learning programs, is increased by $2,000,000  to
improve wage parity for providers of the Healthy Families Oregon program.
SECTION 362. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (5), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for distribution as grants-in-aid, for program costs
and to  purchase services, for other early learning programs, is increased by $122,830 for the
Healthy Families Oregon program.
SECTION 363. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 267 (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws  2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  allocation to the Oregon Health Authority or De-
partment of Human Services for caseload  costs or other budget challenges that the agency
is unable to mitigate, is increased by $45,000,000.
SECTION 364. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $100,000,000 for increasing behavioral health housing.
SECTION 365. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by  $1,500,000 for increasing provider rates for applied behavior
analysis.
SECTION 366. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $2,900,000 for increasing provider  rates for applied behavior
analysis.
SECTION 367. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and  analytics, and
public health, is increased by $5,000,000 for the Healthy Homes Program.
SECTION 368. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for distribution to Seeding Justice for advancing
reproductive health equity.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 42
SECTION 369. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  668, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems, health policy and  analytics, and
public health, is increased by $246,476 for costs associated with implementing  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2022 (Enrolled House Bill 4045).
SECTION 370. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $89,898 for  costs associated with implementing chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2022 (Enrolled House Bill 4045).
SECTION 371. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $47,721,994 to increase provider rates for nursing facilities,  home and
community-based care, and in-home care agencies.
SECTION 372. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $66,856,934 to increase provider rates for nursing facilities, home  and
community-based care and in-home care agencies.
SECTION 373. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for intellectual/developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $46,000 to  increase the private duty nursing rate for in-home intensive
care for children.
SECTION 374. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by  $69,000 to increase the private duty nursing rate for in-home in-
tensive care for children.
SECTION 375.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$1,106,974, for family treatment courts.
SECTION 376. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 427,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is increased by $384,668, for family treatment courts.
SECTION 377. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is  increased by $762,623, for family treat-
ment courts.
SECTION 378. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 444, Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 43
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Juvenile Division,  is increased by
$195,833, for the Parent Child Representation Program and family treatment courts.
SECTION 379. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Society of St. Vincent de
Paul of Lane County for a
not-for-profit manufactured
housing production facility ....... $ 15,000,000
(2) Oregon Community Foundation
for converting buildings
to shelter through the
Project Turnkey program ......... $ 50,000,000
(3) Hacienda Community Development
Corporation for home lending
products for underrepresented
populations................................ $ 5,000,000
(4) Multnomah County for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 10,000,000
(5) Washington County for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 750,000
(6) Clackamas County for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 2,000,000
(7) City of Hillsboro for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 1,000,000
(8) City of Beaverton for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 750,000
(9) City of Eugene for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 5,000,000
(10) City of Salem for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 2,500,000
(11) City of Bend for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
homeless outreach .................... $ 1,500,000
(12) City of Medford for shelter
services and infrastructure,
hygiene services and
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 44
homeless outreach .................... $ 1,500,000
(13) City of Eugene for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 750,000
(14) City of Salem for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 750,000
(15) City of Bend for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 400,000
(16) City of Medford for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 350,000
(17) City of Springfield for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 250,000
(18) City of Corvallis for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 250,000
(19) City of Albany for trash
and sanitation services ............. $ 250,000
SECTION 380. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $100,000, for distribution to the Portland
Council Navy League of the United States, USS Oregon (SSN  793) Commissioning Committee,
to support celebration events related to the submarine’s commissioning ceremony.
SECTION 381. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $85,661, for distribution to the City of  Gates
to offset revenue loss from the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 382. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $69,722, for distribution to the City of
Stayton Rural Fire Protection District to offset revenue loss from the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 383. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,534,000, for  distribution to the City of
Phoenix to support the construction of the Public Safety Center.
SECTION 384. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $375,000, for distribution to the Eugene
Water and Electric Board for  the Powder Activated Carbon Water Treatment Improvement
Project.
SECTION 385.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any appropriation, there is appropriated
to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out of the General Fund,
the amount of $42,500,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority for increasing be-
havioral health provider rates.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 386. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 10 (1), chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation  to the Oregon Health Authority for behavioral
health system transformation and realignment activities, is decreased by $49,000,000.
SECTION 387. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 34 (1), chapter 669, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to state agencies for family treatment court
programs, is decreased by $2,065,430.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 45
SECTION 388. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission by section 1, chapter 379, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  is increased by $300,000, for the Legal
Services Pilot Program at the Coffee  Creek Correctional Facility operated by the Oregon
Justice Resource Center,  established in section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2022 (Enrolled
House Bill 4050).
SECTION 389. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 662, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by  $20,000,000, for matching funds
for the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s Hazard Mitigation Grant Program.
SECTION 390. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit  into the Oregon
Local Disaster Assistance Loan and Grant Account established in ORS  401.536, for matching
funds for the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s Hazard Mitigation Grant Program.
SECTION 391. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$20,000,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for mitigation and recovery,  to expend as matching funds for the
Federal Emergency Management Agency’s Hazard Mitigation Grant Program.
SECTION 392.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $966,262, for a grant to Mid-Willamette
Valley Community Action Agency for shelter funding.
SECTION 393. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Rooftop Solar  Incentive Fund
established by section 3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 394. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 108, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses by the State Depart-
ment of Energy for the solar rebate program from the Rooftop  Solar Incentive Fund is in-
creased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 395. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, for  deposit into the Zero-Emission In-
centive Fund established by ORS 468.449.
SECTION 396. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 673,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for  smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws  2021, collected or received by the Department of Environmental
Quality, for air quality, is  increased by $15,000,000 for the issuance of zero-emission and
electric vehicle rebates.
SECTION 397. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, for deposit into  the Medium and Heavy-
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 46
Duty Electrification Fund established under section 4, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2022 (En-
rolled House Bill 4139), for a grant program supporting medium and heavy-duty zero-emission
vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure projects.
SECTION 398.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 673,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for  smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws  2021, collected or received by the Department of Environmental
Quality, for air quality, is increased by $15,000,000 for a grant program supporting  medium
and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure projects.
SECTION 399. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 679, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for the Fish Division, is increased by
$8,000,000 for fish passage barrier removal.
SECTION 400. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3a (1), chapter  613, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
for the purposes of the Oregon Conservation and  Recreation Fund, is decreased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 401. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023,
out of  the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund established by ORS 496.252.
SECTION 402. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  679, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter 679, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Wildlife Division, is increased by $5,000,000 for the  conservation
and recreation program.
SECTION 403. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter 679, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Habitat Division, is increased  by
$2,600,000 for activities to improve drought resiliency.
SECTION 404. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000 for road and bridge repair and  replacement in
Marion County.
SECTION 405. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Transportation from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Transportation, for the  following
purposes:
(1) Marion County Public Works
for safety corridor
improvements ........................... $ 3,000,000
(2) City of Canby for Walnut
Street extension ........................ $ 2,960,000
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 47
(3) Crook County for Combs
Flat Road extension .................. $ 9,400,000
(4) City of Dufur for sidewalk
renovation................................. $ 500,000
SECTION 406. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1, chapter 383, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Racing Commission,  is increased by $53,106 for the pur-
pose of greyhound race reporting.
NOTE:
 Section 407 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 408. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 167 (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation for for the state’s natural disaster pre-
vention, preparedness, response and recovery activities, is decreased by $25,000,000.
SECTION 409.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for Oregon Health and Science
University education and other programs,  is increased by $1,500,000 for developing a state-
wide behavioral health capacity dashboard tool.
SECTION 410. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter  660, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described  in sections 8 to 12, chapter 660, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $185,000 for costs of bonds issuance.
SECTION 411.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) $10,142,845 for distribution to the University of Oregon to purchase  scientific equip-
ment for Building 2 of the Phil and Penny Knight Campus for Accelerating  Scientific Impact.
(2) $16,500,000 for distribution to Western Oregon University to support  the main steam
line replacement project.
(3) $6,500,000 for distribution to Oregon State University for  the Hatfield Housing project.
(4) $4,500,000 for distribution to the University of Oregon to support  the Oregon Hazards
Lab (OHAZ) Wildfire Camera Network.
(5) $350,000 for distribution to Oregon State University  for the repair and maintenance
of research vessel Pacific Storm.
SECTION 412. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund,  the following amounts for distribution to the following entities
for the following purposes:
(1) Southwestern Oregon
Community College for a new
fire training tower .................... $ 755,000
(2) Linn-Benton Community College
for the Takena Hall elevator .... $ 577,500
(3) Treasure Valley Community
College for the Renewable
Energy Apprenticeship and
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 48
Pre-Apprenticeship Programs... $ 2,500,000
(4) Oregon State University for
the Innovation District
Landfill Project ......................... $ 10,000,000
(5) Eastern Oregon University
for Visual and Performing
Arts Scholarship ....................... $ 1,000,000
(6) Oregon State University for
the modernization of the
Oregon Agricultural Research
Center ....................................... $ 250,000
SECTION 413.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount
$4,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services  and transferred to the Higher Education Coordinat-
ing Commission, for distribution  to Eastern Oregon University for restoration of the Grand
Staircase.
SECTION 414. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 192, chapter 669,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for a municipal wildfire assistance
program, is increased by $2,000,000.
SECTION 415. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for deposit in the  Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund established under ORS 284.801.
SECTION 416. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department  from the Eastern
Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund established under  ORS 284.801, for dis-
tribution to the third-party administrator under ORS 284.783.
SECTION 417. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department from American  Res-
cue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Business Development
Department, for infrastructure, for grants to the following entities for the following pur-
poses:
(1) City of Garibaldi -
Wastewater Master Plan .......... $ 160,000
(2) City of Garibaldi -
Smart Water Meters ................. $ 201,128
(3) Hyak Tongue Point, LLC -
1500 Metric Ton Mobile
Lift Project ............................... $ 7,000,000
(4) City of Reedsport - Flood
reduction resiliency project ...... $ 1,150,260
(5) City of Waldport -
Wastewater Treatment Plant
Disinfection System
Improvements ........................... $ 1,400,000
(6) City of Mill City
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 49
Sewer Improvements ................ $ 2,500,000
(7) City of Aumsville - Drinking
Water System Improvements ... $ 757,000
(8) City of Lafayette
Reservoir Project ...................... $ 2,250,000
(9) City of Falls City
Wastewater Treatment Facility $ 2,500,000
(10) City of Merrill - Water
Line Improvements ................... $ 275,000
SECTION 418. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for a grant to Historic Rivoli Theater
Performing Arts Center Restoration Coalition for Rivoli Theater restoration.
SECTION 419. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Lands by section  1, chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for deposit into  the Oregon Ocean Science Fund es-
tablished under ORS 196.567, to be expended by the Oregon  Ocean Science Trust, is increased
by $1,000,000, for science and monitoring  on nearshore keystone species including sea otters,
nearshore marine ecosystems, kelp and eelgrass habitat and sequestration of blue carbon.
SECTION 420. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 188, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of
State Lands for distribution of grants from the Oregon Ocean  Science Fund established un-
der ORS 196.567, is increased by  $1,000,000, for science and monitoring on nearshore keystone
species including sea otters, nearshore  marine ecosystems, kelp and eelgrass habitat and
sequestration of blue carbon.
SECTION 421. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 425,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys,  or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise asset management, is  increased by $195,000 for bond issuance costs associated
with bonds issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 422.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the provision of grants to the following entities
for the following purposes: 
(1) McKenzie River Discovery
Center ....................................... $ 3,048,464
(2) City of Portland Parks and
Recreation for the North
Portland Aquatic Center ........... $ 15,210,747
(3) City of Milton-Freewater
for the police and dispatch
station....................................... $ 3,048,464
SECTION 423.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following
entities for the following purposes:
(1) Grande Ronde Hospital
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 50
Foundation for the expansion
of the Surgical Center and
facilities .................................... $ 5,000,000
(2) City of Ashland for the
Briscoe School Rehabilitation ... $ 1,300,000
(3) Marion-Polk Food Share for
the AWARE Food Bank ............ $ 2,407,500
(4) Farmworker Housing Development
Corporation for the Cipriano
Ferrell Education Center
Renovation................................ $ 1,000,000
(5) Heart of Oregon Corps
Centralized Campus .................. $ 2,000,000
(6) Eugene Civic Alliance
Civic Park ................................. $ 6,000,000
(7) Lane County Fairgrounds
Multi-Use Facility ..................... $ 7,500,000
(8) Central Oregon
Intergovernmental Council
for the CORE3 (Central OR
Ready, Responsive,
Resilient) program .................... $ 9,500,000
(9) Columbia Gorge Children’s
Advocacy Center (DBA
SafeSpace) for the Child
Abuse Assessment Center ........ $ 2,000,000
(10) City of Corvallis for Martin
Luther King, Jr. (MLK) Park
enhancements ........................... $ 4,000,000
(11) Prairie City School District
#4 for the Bates Building
renovation................................. $ 430,000
(12) Prairie City Senior Citizens
for building renovation ............. $ 113,870
(13) Kids Club of Harney County
to support phase 2 of the
Geno’s Youth Center ................ $ 1,340,213
(14) Oregon Food Bank for the
statewide warehouse................. $ 5,000,000
(15) City of Wilsonville for the
Transit Center .......................... $ 1,926,000
(16) Grant County Senior Citizens
Association for the Senior
Center flooring and air
purification system ................... $ 36,129
(17) City of Independence to
support the 9th Street
Lift Station upgrade .................. $ 2,000,000
(18) Benton County Crisis Center .... $ 5,450,002
(19) Peace Village to support
SquareOne Villages ................... $ 3,300,000
(20) MountainStar Family Relief
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 51
Nursery to support the
La Pine Satellite Location ........ $ 165,000
(21) Lane County for Emergency
Response Functionality............. $ 5,000,000
(22) Health Care Hub of South
Deschutes County for the
La Pine Community Health
Center ....................................... $ 3,000,000
(23) Cultivate Initiatives for the
Resource Hub and Navigation
Center ....................................... $ 2,950,000
(24) City of Salem to support
Navigation Center ..................... $ 1,900,000
(25) The Canby Center to support
Thriving Together capital
improvements ........................... $ 1,125,000
(26) City of Monmouth to support
the skate park replacement
and recreation park
improvements ........................... $ 525,000
(27) Wheeler County to support
the Glover Hall renovation ....... $ 405,000
(28) Community Counseling Solutions
to support the Northeast
Oregon Regional Acute Care
Center ....................................... $ 4,590,000
(29) Newberg School District to
support the Old Renne Park
improvement............................. $ 750,000
(30) Harney County Cultural Center
for County Fairgrounds ............ $ 1,360,000
(31) City of John Day to fund
the Grant Union High School
roof and the Humbolt
Elementary HVAC projects ....... $ 2,250,000
(32) Oasis Village to support
transitional housing in
Redmond................................... $ 350,000
(33) City of Aurora Fire Station ...... $ 3,800,000
(34) Salem Housing Authority to
support Yaquina Hall ................ $ 1,500,000
(35) Wallowa History Center to
support the restoration of
the Bear-Sleds Ranger
District Compound .................... $ 500,000
SECTION 424.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount
$2,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the  purpose of transfer to the Special Districts
Association of Oregon Grant Program.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 52
SECTION 425. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution  to the following
entities for the following purposes:
(1) Ella Curran Food Bank for
food bank expansion.................. $ 1,000,000
(2) Benevolent and Protective
Order of Elks Independence,
Lodge No. 1950, for veterans’
outreach.................................... $ 80,000
(3) Devils Lake Water Improvement
District for invasive aquatic
vegetation management ............ $ 310,000
(4) Lincoln City Parks and
Recreation for the Regional
Sport and Recreation
Complex..................................... $ 1,000,000
(5) Port of Bandon for High Dock
Administrative Offices .............. $ 576,000
(6) Port of Newport for seawall
repair ........................................ $ 1,140,000
(7) Synapse Fitness Foundation
for Executive Director
position costs and training
for one year .............................. $ 70,000
(8) City of Lebanon for the Park
Accessibility Project ................. $ 2,600,000
(9) Colton Rural Fire District for
replacement of a water
tender chassis ........................... $ 75,000
(10) City of Aumsville for the
new Public Works Facility ........ $ 900,000
(11) Strategic Economic Development
Corporation of the Mid-
Willamette Valley for Newberg
Workforce Housing ................... $ 3,000,000
(12) City of Roseburg for the
Southern Oregon Medical
Workforce Center ..................... $ 5,000,000
(13) City of Medford for the
Rogue Credit Union Community
Complex..................................... $ 3,000,000
(14) Crook County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
(15) Malheur County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
(16) Harney County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
(17) Grant County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
(18) Baker County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 53
(19) Lake County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 2,000,000
(20) South Wasco County School
District #1 for the renovation
of the South Wasco County
High School track facilities ..... $ 900,000
(21) Mid-Columbia Community Action
Council for the Navigation
Center ....................................... $ 1,500,000
(22) Union County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(23) Umatilla County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(24) Wheeler County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(25) Wallowa County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(26) Morrow County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(27) Sherman County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(28) Wasco County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(29) Gilliam County Fair for
fairgrounds infrastructure ........ $ 1,000,000
(30) Hermiston School District
for the Columbia Basin
Apprenticeship Training
Center ....................................... $ 1,500,000
(31) Ukiah School District for
teacher housing ........................ $ 500,000
(32) Umatilla County for the
Umatilla County Road
Digitized Pilot Project............... $ 250,000
(33) City of Heppner for the
Community Development Fund . $ 500,000
(34) City of Antelope for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(35) City of Spray for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(36) City of Mitchell for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(37) City of Fossil for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(38) City of Grass Valley for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(39) City of Rufus for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(40) City of Maupin for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(41) City of Moro for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 54
(42) City of Wasco for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(43) City of Tygh Valley for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(44) City of Condon for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
(45) City of Arlington for the
Community Development Fund . $ 166,666
SECTION 426. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 660, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Education Stability Fund to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission
by section 4, chapter 660, Oregon Laws 2021, for Oregon  Opportunity Grants, is increased by
$17,546,266 to account for additional Lottery Funds revenues for the program.
SECTION 427. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (4),  chapter 660,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  Oregon Opportunity Grants, is
decreased by $17,546,266 to account for additional Lottery Funds revenues for the program.
SECTION 428. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  95, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund mon-
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Department of Corrections, for the purpose  of expenditures and activities to respond to the
COVID-19 public health emergency, is increased by $363,582.
SECTION 429.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations and health services, is decreased by
$363,582.
SECTION 430.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  76, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal
Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for
expenditures and  activities to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency and its
economic impacts, is increased by $309,332,010.
SECTION 431. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  75, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services from American  Rescue Plan Act Capital Projects Fund
moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the purpose of
transfer to the Oregon  Business Development Department for deposit in the Broadband Fund
established by section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special  session), is increased by
$36,795,418.
SECTION 432. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 559, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for general program, is decreased by
$9,500,000.
SECTION 433.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (2), chapter 559, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for debt service, is decreased by $294,479.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 55
SECTION 434. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 6, chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for biennial offices, is decreased by $2,851,096.
SECTION 435.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative  Assembly by section 7 (1), chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly, is decreased
by $236,004.
SECTION 436. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 7 (2), chapter 559,  Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Eighty-second  Legislative Assembly, is decreased
by $3,162,124.
SECTION 437. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 8, chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Legislative Equity Office, is decreased by $483,717.
SECTION 438.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Counsel Committee by section 11, chapter  559, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $1,750,000.
SECTION 439. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative  Fiscal Officer by section 14 (1), chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $2,871,447.
SECTION 440. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Policy and Research  Committee by section 15, chapter 559,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $1,527,845.
SECTION 441. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Revenue Officer by section 16, chapter 559, Oregon  Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $245,265.
SECTION 442. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission on Indian Services by section 17, chapter 559, Oregon  Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $256,973.
SECTION 443. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$235,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee, for general obligation bond issuance costs.
SECTION 444. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter 438, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for the planning pro-
gram, is increased  by $150,000 to support work on regional housing needs and land supply
issues.
SECTION 445. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Capital
Projects Fund established under ORS 276.005, for state facilities security  and capital im-
provements.
SECTION 446. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following
entities for the following purposes:
(1) Lane County for the East
Gateway construction ............... $ 150,000
(2) Lane County for Phase 1
construction of the South
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 56
Lane Health Clinic .................... $ 250,000
(3) City of Oakridge for
renovation of the Willamette
Activity Center ......................... $ 1,500,000
(4) City of Florence for the
Emergency Fuel Station
project....................................... $ 250,000
(5) Lane County for the Goodpasture
Covered Bridge Rehabilitation
project....................................... $ 3,600,000
SECTION 447.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount  of $10,000,000, to be allocated for establishing a grant program, loan
program or  lending program for the purpose of providing financial assistance to employers
to mitigate the costs associated with compliance with the overtime compensation require-
ments under section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2022 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 448.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter 558, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, is increased by $509,117 for enforcement of wage
and hour laws required under chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2022 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 449. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $400,000, for core systems replacement, for the Electronic
Valuation Information System (ELVIS) technology project.
NOTE:
 Section 450 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 451. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for distribution to the metro-
politan service district established under ORS chapter 268, for  trash and sanitation services.
SECTION 452. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  81, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services from  Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act
Coronavirus Relief Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, for expenditures and  activities to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency
and its economic impacts is increased by $82,495,564.
SECTION 453. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon  Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $35,000,000 to address cost  increases impacting affordable housing developments that re-
ceived funding awards from the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 454. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 57
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 556, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $17,500,000 for small affordable rental housing project developments.
SECTION 455. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $19,000,000, to be allocated to the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission for an Oregon Tribal Student Grant program.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 456. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Aviation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,598,406, for the  Cape Blanco State Airport runway and
electrical rehabilitation.
SECTION 457. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Aviation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $540,388, for distribution to the City of  Salem, for the
Salem Municipal Airport upgrade.
SECTION 458. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon  Department of Aviation, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of  $750,000, for distribution to Josephine County, for a Jet
A and Avgas aircraft fueling system at the Illinois Valley Airport.
SECTION 459. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 126, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  described in section 126,
chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for  core
systems  replacement, for the purposes of implementing the Electronic Valuation Information
System (ELVIS), is decreased by $435,000.
SECTION 460. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (2), chapter 503,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Workers’ Compensation Division, is decreased by $58,428.
SECTION 461. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (5), chapter  503, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Central Services Division, is increased by $175,320.
SECTION 462. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6), chapter 503,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Division of Financial Regulation, is increased by $312,264.
SECTION 463. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (7), chapter  503, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 58
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Building Codes Division, is decreased by $36,624.
SECTION 464. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Transportation from  a subaccount of the Oregon
Transportation Infrastructure Fund established under ORS 367.015,  for the purpose of fund-
ing projects that reduce the number  of wildlife-vehicle collisions and improve habitat
connectivity for wildlife.
SECTION 465. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for the following agencies and programs are changed
by the specified amounts  to reflect unexpended General Fund balances, pursuant to ORS
293.195:
(1) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 559 1(1) +10,577,899
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 559 1(2) +167,392
General Fund Ch. 559 1(2) +127,087
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 559 6 +2,851,096
81st Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 559 7(1) +236,004
82nd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 559 7(2) +3,162,124
Legislative Equity Office
General Fund Ch. 559 8 +483,717
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 11 +1,903,036
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 14(1) +2,871,447
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 15 +1,527,845
Legislative Revenue
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 59
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 16 +245,265
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 17 +256,973
(2) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 167 1(1) +12,001
Extraordinary expenses
General Fund Ch. 167 1(2) +9,616
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund Ch. 557 1(1) +1,915,668
Operations
General Fund Ch. 557 1(2) +756,039
Mandated Payments
General Fund Ch. 557 1(3) +1,484,640
State Court technology
systems
General Fund Ch. 557 1(4) +145,212
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 557 1(5) +10,249
Council on Court
Procedures
General Fund Ch. 557 5 +51,710
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(3) +135,221
Trial Criminal Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(4) +1,697
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(8) +132,450
SECTION 466. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 60
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 425 1(6) -62,858
Other funds Ch. 425 2(12) +486,025
Lottery funds Ch. 425 3 -423,153
Department of Revenue:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 441 1(7) -71,491
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 560 1(3) -8,955
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(4) -3,403,866
Other funds Ch. 669 212 +3,412,834
(3) EDUCATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 603 4 -233,678
Other funds Ch. 669 36 +233,685
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 61
Public university
debt service
General Fund Ch. 660
1(10)(a) -1,030,391
Other funds Ch. 660 6(2) +695,171
Community college
debt service
Other funds Ch. 660 6(3) +1,030,420
(4) HUMAN SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Human
Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 606 1(8) -900,000
Other funds Ch. 606 2(9) +944,250
(5) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 557 1(5) -273,641
(6) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Forestry Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 605 1(5) -656
Other funds Ch. 605 2(7) +660
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 62
(7) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 468 1(5) -105,000
Other funds Ch. 669 5 +105,000
Department of Justice:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 427 1(7) -52,175
(8) TRANSPORTATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of
Transportation:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 442 1(1) -180
Other funds Ch. 442 2(18) +799,991
Lottery funds Ch. 442 4 -799,809
SECTION 467. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 345 1 +49,573
Oregon Department of
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 63
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
General Fund Ch. 425 1(1) +107,351
Other funds Ch. 425 2(1) +246,124
Chief Financial Office
Other funds Ch. 425 2(2) +492,272
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds Ch. 425 2(3) +1,846,720
Chief Human Resources Office
Other funds Ch. 425 2(4) +859,460
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 425
2(5)(a) +1,666,387
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds Ch. 425 2(6) +1,474,963
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds Ch. 425 2(7) +2,353,962
Business Services
Other funds Ch. 425 2(8) +91,335
ODAS Information Technology
Other funds Ch. 425 2(14) +360,604
Operating Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 425 5 +105,897
State Treasury:
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(1) +911,554
Trust Property Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(2) +215,255
Investment Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(3) +1,506,644
Public Savings Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(4) +109,445
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(5) +355,487
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 383 1 +119,090
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(1) +450,112
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(2) +437,471
Information Services
Division
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 64
Other funds Ch. 145 1(3) +765,286
Operations Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(4) +1,339,117
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(5) +225,510
Core Retirement System,
Implementation of chapter
355, Oregon Laws 2019,
Operational implementation
Other funds Ch. 145
1(6)(a)(D) +352,415
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 505 1(1) +115,333
Other funds Ch. 505 2(1) +618,065
Elections Division
General Fund Ch. 505 1(2) +242,507
Federal funds Ch. 505 3 +52,776
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(4) +248,084
Audits Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(3) +986,334
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(5) +372,697
Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds Ch. 640 1(1) +2,449,889
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds Ch. 640 1(2) +754,562
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds Ch. 640 1(3) +188,366
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 441 1(1) +578,436
Other funds Ch. 441 2(1) +65,017
Property Tax Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(2) +644,687
Other funds Ch. 441 2(2) +161,373
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(3) +2,504,784
Other funds Ch. 441 2(3) +48,156
Business Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(4) +630,069
Other funds Ch. 441 2(4) +458,774
Information Technology
Services Division
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 65
General Fund Ch. 441 1(6) +1,243,441
Other funds Ch. 441 2(7) +234,213
Core System Replacement
Other funds Ch. 669 126 +25,613
Collections Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(5) +669,785
Other funds Ch. 441 2(5) +620,070
Marijuana Program
Other funds Ch. 441 2(8) +122,486
Corporate Division
Other funds Ch. 441 2(6) +744,360
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds Ch. 441 2(9) +60,696
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 166 1 +92,159
Operating Expenses (fees)
Other funds Ch. 166 2 +6,584
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds Ch. 166 3 +65,828
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 434 1 +697,911
Other funds Ch. 434 4 +136,952
Regional Solutions Program
Lottery funds Ch. 434 3 +108,408
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 288 1 +81,326
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 308 1 +75,132
Federal funds Ch. 308 4 +53,355
Operating Expenses
- Non-Assessments
Other funds Ch. 308 2 +4,092
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds Ch. 308 3 +175,270
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 66
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 377 1 +80,432
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 348 1 +12,753
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 347 1 +479,464
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds Ch. 437 1 +93,161
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds Ch. 437 2 +40,990
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 346 1 +27,044
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 440 1 +59,353
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 287 1 +90,535
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds Ch. 504 1 +82,664
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds Ch. 504 2 +18,435
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 504 3 +10,610
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 504 4 +27,117
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 504 5 +26,356
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 504 6 +41,463
Bureau of Labor and
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 67
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 558 1 +749,104
Other funds Ch. 558 2 +260,470
Federal funds Ch. 558 4 +75,383
Lottery funds Ch. 558 5 +9,393
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds Ch. 558 3(1) +117,023
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds Ch. 382 1(1) +1,053,991
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 382 1(2) +40,695
Administration
Other funds Ch. 382 1(3) +328,616
Operating Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 382 2 +38,659
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 382 1(4) +14,000
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds Ch. 503 1(1) +787,156
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(2) +1,515,400
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 503 1(3) +1,401,245
Federal funds Ch. 503 2(1) +525,306
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(5) +1,580,620
Federal funds Ch. 503 2(3) +7,325
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds Ch. 503 1(6) +1,775,953
Building Codes Division
General Fund Ch. 669 263 +15,444
Other funds Ch. 503 1(7) +1,192,946
Health Insurance
Marketplace
Other funds Ch. 503 1(4) -92,221
Federal funds Ch. 503 2(2) -31,836
Prescription Drug
Affordability Board
General Fund Ch. 598 10 +77,468
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 68
Other funds Ch. 311 1 +221,861
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 310 1 +494,501
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 309 1 +394,482
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 168 1 +227,644
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund Ch. 560 1(1) +23,360
Business, Innovation and
Trade
General Fund Ch. 560 1(2) +12,447
Other funds Ch. 560 2(1) +291,966
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(1) +308,109
Federal funds Ch. 560 4(1) +15,196
Infrastructure
General Fund Ch. 560 1(4) +23,966
Other funds Ch. 560 2(2) +207,141
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(5) +97,627
Federal funds Ch. 560 4(2) +36,298
Operations
Other funds Ch. 560 2(3) +112,827
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(2) +361,926
Federal funds Ch. 560 4(3) +5,673
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds Ch. 560 2(4) +65,062
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 556 1 +388,602
Other funds Ch. 556 2 +2,274,433
Federal funds Ch. 556 4 +715,284
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 69
General Fund Ch. 471 1(1) +213,208
Lottery funds Ch. 471 2(1) +235,016
Federal funds Ch. 471 4 +10,750
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds Ch. 471 3(1) +433,605
Employment Department:
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
General Fund Ch. 426 1(2) +837,180
Other funds Ch. 426 2(3) +232,626
Shared Services
General Fund Ch. 426 1(1) +721,757
Modernization Initiative
General Fund Ch. 426 1(3) +103,110
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds Ch. 426 2(1) +4,412,905
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds Ch. 426 2(2) +1,041,705
Modernization Initiative
Other funds Ch. 426 2(4) +820,710
Operating Budget
Federal funds Ch. 426 5 +11,906,326
(4) EDUCATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 641 1 +255,152
Nontraditional Pathway to
Licensure Programs
General Fund Ch. 518 20 +30,797
Performance Based Measures
General Fund Ch. 637 4 +24,901
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 603 1(1) +2,474,849
Other funds Ch. 603 5(2) +635,268
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 70
Federal funds Ch. 603 7(1) +2,416,857
Oregon School for the Deaf
General Fund Ch. 603 1(2) +449,104
Other funds Ch. 603 5(3) +87,650
Federal funds Ch. 603 7(2) +3,253
Early Learning Account
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 603 11 +118,768
Statewide Education
Initiatives Account
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 603 13 +1,023,933
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs and grants
General Fund Ch. 660 1(1) +671,719
Other funds Ch. 660 6(1) +397,495
Federal funds Ch. 660 7 +419,411
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund Ch. 469 1(1) +188,669
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund Ch. 469 1(2) +156,117
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 469 2 +13,522
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 378 1 +129,720
Other funds Ch. 378 2 +3,717
Federal funds Ch. 378 3 +382,173
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 380 1 +148,318
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services
General Fund Ch. 606 1(1) +2,223,777
Other funds Ch. 606 2(1) -153,958
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 71
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(1) +1,063,124
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(2) +4,552,850
Other funds Ch. 606 2(2) +220,384
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(2) +2,747,444
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(3) +12,623,324
Other funds Ch. 606 2(3) +17,129
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(3) +7,792,205
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund Ch. 606 1(4) +572,151
Other funds Ch. 606 2(4) +20,030
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(4) +1,676,170
Child Welfare Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(5) +21,491,002
Other funds Ch. 606 2(5) +8,458
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(5) +7,664,022
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(6) +7,280,295
Other funds Ch. 606 2(6) +1,515,320
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(6) +6,992,346
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(7) +2,945,234
Other funds Ch. 606 2(7) +34,888
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(7) +4,495,106
Shared Services
Other funds Ch. 606 2(8) +6,035,307
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health
General Fund Ch. 668 1(1) +4,820,137
Other funds Ch. 668 2(1) +3,911,553
Lottery funds Ch. 668 3(1) +28,016
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(1) +6,919,293
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund Ch. 668 1(2) +24,470,798
Other funds Ch. 668 2(2) +438,141
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(2) +775,704
Central Services, State
Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 668 1(3) +4,518,794
Other funds Ch. 668 2(3) +627,148
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(3) +1,505,464
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds Ch. 668 2(4) +6,047,127
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 72
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 167 1(1) +4,075
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund Ch. 557 1(1) +2,605,107
Operations
General Fund Ch. 557 1(2) +14,542,113
Other funds Ch. 557 2(1) +772,853
Federal funds Ch. 557 3 +29,837
Mandated Payments
General Fund Ch. 557 1(3) +187,871
Other funds Ch. 557 2(2) +1,447
State Court Facilities
and Security Account
Other funds Ch. 557 2(3) +45,548
State Court Technology
Fund
Other funds Ch. 557 2(4) +482,597
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Executive Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(1) +143,103
Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(2) +248,409
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(3) +750,390
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 444 1(8) +457,739
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 73
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 559 1(1) +856,691
Other funds Ch. 559 2(1) +12,294
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 559 6 +590,290
81st Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 559 7(1) +1,033,657
82nd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 559 7(2) +630,341
Legislative Equity Office
General Fund Ch. 559 8 +15,243
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 11 +721,768
Other funds Ch. 559 12 +60,856
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 14(1) +253,382
Other funds Ch. 559 14(2) +154,495
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 15 +603,535
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 16 +139,698
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 17 +26,364
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds Ch. 428 1(1) +188,595
Marine Law Enforcement
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 74
Other funds Ch. 428 1(2) +51,982
Facilities construction
and maintenance
Other funds Ch. 428 1(3) +84,400
Federal funds Ch. 428 2(3) +11,299
Aquatic invasive species
Other funds Ch. 428 1(4) +8,240
State Department of Energy:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 423 1 +2,944
Other funds Ch. 423 2 +757,841
Federal funds Ch. 423 4 +111,534
Energy Development Services
General Fund Ch. 669 107 +31,457
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
General Fund Ch. 5 1 +104,636
Federal funds Ch. 5 3 -6,243
Geologic Survey
Other funds Ch. 5 2(1) -5,124
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds Ch. 5 2(2) +69,263
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Other funds Ch. 561 1(1) +5,330
Lottery funds Ch. 561 2(1) +28,109
Central Services
Other funds Ch. 561 1(2) +345,701
Lottery funds Ch. 561 2(2) +362,211
Direct Services
Other funds Ch. 561 1(4) +1,750,448
Lottery funds Ch. 561 2(4) +1,694,964
Federal funds Ch. 561 4(2) +11,131
Community Support and
Grants
Other funds Ch. 561 1(5) +56,145
Lottery funds Ch. 561 2(5) +168,261
Federal funds Ch. 561 4(3) +40,704
Outdoor Recreation
Advisory Committee
General Fund Ch. 669 178 +11,294
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 439 1 +96,304
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(1) +165,092
Other funds Ch. 665 3(1) +44,756
Field Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(2) +518,433
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 75
Other funds Ch. 665 3(2) +105,615
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund Ch. 665 1(3) +126,732
Other funds Ch. 665 3(3) +111,914
Technical Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(4) +496,224
Other funds Ch. 665 3(4) +136,360
Federal funds Ch. 665 4(4) +12,366
Director’s Office
General Fund Ch. 665 1(5) +167,109
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operating Expenses,
Activities and Projects
Lottery funds Ch. 680 5 +227,261
Operations
General Fund Ch. 669 69(4) +36,932
Federal funds Ch. 680 7(1) +123,676
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund Programs
Other funds Ch. 607 1(1) +725,812
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds Ch. 607 1(3) +104,813
Federal funds Ch. 607 3(1) +56,947
Oregon Wetlands
Revolving Fund
Other funds Ch. 607 1(5) +2,471
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund Ch. 600 1(1) +49,296
Other funds Ch. 600 2(1) +288,219
Food Safety
General Fund Ch. 600 1(2) +370,952
Other funds Ch. 600 2(2) +743,232
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(2) +9,384
Natural Resources
General Fund Ch. 600 1(3) +261,712
Other funds Ch. 600 2(3) +650,281
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(3) +130,283
Market Access
General Fund Ch. 600 1(4) +82,487
Other funds Ch. 600 2(4) +457,350
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(4) +75,239
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 600 3 +213,188
Department of Environmental
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 76
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund Ch. 673 1(1) +676,152
Other funds Ch. 673 2(1) +1,557,730
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(1) +194,839
Water Quality
General Fund Ch. 673 1(2) +1,199,293
Other funds Ch. 673 2(2) +941,874
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(2) +254,755
Land Quality
General Fund Ch. 673 1(3) +36,054
Other funds Ch. 673 2(3) +1,529,643
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(3) +128,385
Agency Management
General Fund Ch. 673 1(4) +3,445
Other funds Ch. 673 2(4) +922,275
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 673 3 +224,550
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(1) +709,192
Other funds Ch. 679 2(1) +1,849,472
Lottery funds Ch. 679 3(1) +70,065
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(1) +2,183,238
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(2) +187,172
Other funds Ch. 679 2(2) +778,725
Lottery funds Ch. 679 3(2) +36,386
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(2) +461,594
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(3) +34,330
Other funds Ch. 679 2(3) +1,164,637
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(3) +148,119
Habitat Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(7) +245,749
Other funds Ch. 679 2(7) +141,809
Lottery funds Ch. 679 3(3) +11,886
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(5) +335,090
Capital Improvement
Other funds Ch. 679 2(4) +23,690
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
General Fund Ch. 605 1(1) +53,323
Other funds Ch. 605 2(1) +1,259,501
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(1) +54,059
Fire Protection
General Fund Ch. 605 1(2) +1,582,696
Other funds Ch. 605 2(2) +2,299,492
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 77
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(2) +169,894
Private Forests
General Fund Ch. 605 1(4) +584,307
Other funds Ch. 605 2(5) +325,291
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(5) +129,185
State Forests
Other funds Ch. 605 2(3) +1,643,200
Federal Forest Restoration
General Fund Ch. 605 1(3) +301,215
Other funds Ch. 605 2(4) +2,639
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(4) +30,809
Equipment Pool
General Fund Ch. 605 1(6) +25,088
Other funds Ch. 605 2(8) +258,478
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 438 2 +47,892
Federal funds Ch. 438 3 +130,396
Planning Program
General Fund Ch. 438 1(1) +517,660
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 432 1 +458
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 429 1 +265,696
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal
General Fund Ch. 470 1(1) +7,318,884
Other funds Ch. 470 2(1) -179,911
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(1) -159
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 470 1(2) +215,831
Other funds Ch. 470 2(2) +993,839
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(2) +18,850
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 78
Lottery funds Ch. 470 4 +249,144
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
Other funds Ch. 470 2(3) +258,194
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(3) -221
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund Ch. 470 1(4) +4,548,904
Other funds Ch. 470 2(4) +820,236
Department of Corrections:
Operations and Health
Services
General Fund Ch. 468 1(1) +36,327,123
Other funds Ch. 468 2(1) +720,246
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 468 1(2) +3,450,959
Other funds Ch. 468 2(2) +530,617
Correctional Services
General Fund Ch. 468 1(3) +2,017,908
Community Corrections
General Fund Ch. 468 1(4) +598,696
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 379 1 +218,846
Other funds Ch. 379 3 +24,310
Federal funds Ch. 379 4 +16,073
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund Ch. 433 1 +371,864
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 427 1(1) +19,545
Other funds Ch. 427 2(1) +1,264,970
Appellate Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(2) +808,390
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund Ch. 427 1(3) +513,867
Other funds Ch. 427 2(4) +207,087
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(2) +16,458
Crime Victim and
Survivor Services
General Fund Ch. 427 1(4) +341,323
Other funds Ch. 427 2(5) +8,330
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(3) +118,368
Division of Child Support
General Fund Ch. 427 1(6) +1,203,812
Other funds Ch. 427 2(8) +180,293
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 79
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(4) +2,685,359
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(3) +3,457,207
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(1) +144,001
General Counsel Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(6) +2,213,612
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(7) +1,410,753
Trauma Training Grants
General Fund Ch. 532 8 +9,458
Sanctuary Violation
Hotline and Website
General Fund Ch. 550 10 +39,378
Bias Crimes Response
General Fund Ch. 669 56 +57,183
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 662 1(1) +202,941
Other funds Ch. 662 2(1) +65,032
Federal funds Ch. 662 3(1) +30,450
Operations
General Fund Ch. 662 1(2) +124,195
Other funds Ch. 662 2(2) +137,709
Federal funds Ch. 662 3(2) +2,055,182
Emergency Management
General Fund Ch. 662 1(3) +544,622
Other funds Ch. 662 2(3) +87,813
Federal funds Ch. 662 3(3) +415,470
Community Support
General Fund Ch. 662 1(4) -1
Other funds Ch. 662 2(4) +129,266
Federal funds Ch. 662 3(4) +522,347
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 381 2(1) +1,436,538
Federal funds Ch. 381 3 +9,149
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund Ch. 430 1(1) +5,985,743
Other funds Ch. 430 2(1) +29,145
Community Programs
General Fund Ch. 430 1(2) +963,952
Federal funds Ch. 430 3(1) +198,604
Program Support
General Fund Ch. 430 1(3) +1,403,217
Federal funds Ch. 430 3(2) +46,821
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 80
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 602 1(1) +86,939
Federal funds Ch. 602 2(1) +12,984
Aircraft Registration
Other funds Ch. 602 1(2) +8,175
Pavement Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 602 1(3) +4,048
Department of
Transportation:
Maintenance and Emergency
Relief Programs
Other funds Ch. 442 2(2) +9,322,034
Preservation Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(3) +1,246,371
Bridge Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(4) +1,673,138
Operations Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(5) +1,801,287
Modernization Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(6) +1,994,055
Special Programs
Other funds Ch. 442 2(7) +5,406,704
Local Government Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(8) +532,917
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds Ch. 442 2(9) +6,219,164
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds Ch. 442 2(10) +2,560,630
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds Ch. 442 2(11) +2,073,843
Federal funds Ch. 442 3(3) +3,981
Public Transit
Other funds Ch. 442 2(12) +339,635
Rail
Other funds Ch. 442 2(13) +331,194
Transportation Safety
Other funds Ch. 442 2(14) +128,321
Federal funds Ch. 442 3(6) +106,527
Support Services
Other funds Ch. 442 2(15) +4,068,953
ODOT Headquarters
Other funds Ch. 442 2(16) +522,913
Finance and Budget
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 81
Other funds Ch. 442 2(17) +531,656
SECTION 468. Section 299, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 299.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized appropriations and ex-
penditure limitations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for the following agencies and pro-
grams are changed by the amounts specified:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 345 1 -$16,340
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
Other funds Ch. 425 2(1) -41,343
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 425 [ 1(7)]
1(6) -600,308
Chief Financial Office
Other funds Ch. 425 2(2) -57,772
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds Ch. 425 2(3) -144,309
Chief Human Resource Office
Other funds Ch. 425 2(4) -124,310
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 425 2(5)(a) -877,634
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds Ch. 425 2(6) -65,117
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds Ch. 425 2(7) -1,776,395
Business Services
Other funds Ch. 425 2(8) -1,554,348
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds Ch. 425 2(12) -2,695,360
ODAS Information Technology
Other funds Ch. 425 2(14) +110,879
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 82
Lottery funds Ch. 425 3 -8,932,386
State Treasury:
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(1) -271,372
Investment Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(3) -196,552
Public Savings Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(4) -62,640
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds Ch. 443 1(5) -90,669
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 383 1 -40,195
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(1) -210,200
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(2) -3,306,098
Information Services
Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(3) +7,730
Operations Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(4) -11,469
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds Ch. 145 1(5) -68,410
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 505 1(1) +20,067
Other funds Ch. 505 2(1) -106,645
Elections Division
General Fund Ch. 505 1(2) -211,220
Other funds Ch. 505 2(2) -34
Federal funds Ch. 505 3 -6,971
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(4) -164,264
Audits Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(3) -126,229
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 505 2(5) -155,311
Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds Ch. 640 1(1) -514,975
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 83
Other funds Ch. 640 1(2) -39,720
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds Ch. 640 1(3) -3,722
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 441 1(1) -1,197,563
Other funds Ch. 441 2(1) -325,197
Property Tax Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(2) -117,395
Other funds Ch. 441 2(2) -5,616
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(3) -419,665
Other funds Ch. 441 2(3) -14,434
Business Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(4) -158,912
Other funds Ch. 441 2(4) -58,963
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(6) +40,422
Other funds Ch. 441 2(7) +10,298
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 441 1(7) -789,000
Other funds Ch. 441 2(10) +790,000
Collections Division
General Fund Ch. 441 1(5) -69,688
Other funds Ch. 441 2(5) -40,049
Marijuana Division
Other funds Ch. 441 2(8) -22,802
Corporate Division
Other funds Ch. 441 2(6) -20,201
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds Ch. 441 2(9) -9,469
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 166 1 -77,831
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds Ch. 166 3 -51,846
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 434 1 -476,684
Other funds Ch. 434 4 -92,512
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds Ch. 434 3 -72,430
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 84
Other funds Ch. 288 1 -92,004
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 308 1 -70,697
Operating Expenses
- Non-Assessments
Other funds Ch. 308 2 -96,767
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds Ch. 308 3 -120,049
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 377 1 -$88,512
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 348 1 -69,152
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 347 1 -186,817
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds Ch. 437 1 -94,751
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds Ch. 437 2 -50,980
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 346 1 -79,230
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 440 1 -86,002
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 287 1 -23,039
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 85
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds Ch. 504 1 -54,881
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds Ch. 504 2 -31,572
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 504 3 -14,198
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 504 4 -30,351
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 504 5 -26,641
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 504 6 -31,762
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 558 1 -159,929
Other funds Ch. 558 2 -114,658
Federal funds Ch. 558 4 -14,786
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds Ch. 558 3(1) -27,629
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds Ch. 382 1(1) -215,242
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 382 1(2) -13,440
Administration
Other funds Ch. 382 1(3) -142,891
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 382 1(4) -11,713
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds Ch. 503 1(1) -107,415
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(2) -432,712
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 503 1(3) -503,718
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(5) -329,020
Division of Financial
Regulation
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 86
Other funds Ch. 503 1(6) -408,386
Federal funds Ch. 503 2(5) -157
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(7) -256,616
Health Insurance Exchange
- Marketplace Division
Other funds Ch. 503 1(4) -54,625
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 311 1 -66,208
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 310 1 -123,016
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 309 1 -84,573
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 168 1 -65,797
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund Ch. 560 1(1) -$16,035
Business, Innovation and
Trade
General Fund Ch. 560 1(2) -782
Other funds Ch. 560 2(1) -65,118
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(1) -136,172
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 560 1(3) -2,503,158
Infrastructure
Other funds Ch. 560 2(2) -78,567
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(5) -14,229
Federal funds Ch. 560 4(2) -1,674
Operations
Other funds Ch. 560 2(3) -1,015
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(2) -105,280
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds Ch. 560 2(4) -11,817
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 87
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(4) -10,895,472
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 556 1 -3,465
Other funds Ch. 556 2 -793,556
Federal funds Ch. 556 4 -79,166
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 556 5 -2,321,470
Other funds Ch. 556 6 +33,240
Lottery funds Ch. 556 3 -7,234,990
Non-limited
Other funds Ch. 556 7(3) -7,709
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
General Fund Ch. 471 1(1) -80,837
Lottery funds Ch. 471 2(1) -51,774
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 471 2(4) -690,010
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds Ch. 471 3(1) -238,862
Employment Department:
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
General Fund Ch. 426 1(2) -3,991
Other funds Ch. 426 2(3) -64,681
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds Ch. 426 2(1) -838,693
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds Ch. 426 2(2) -150,666
Modernization Initiative
Other funds Ch. 426 2(4) -243,749
Operating Budget
Federal funds Ch. 426 5 -1,444,089
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) EDUCATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 88
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 641 1 -$242,855
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 603 1(1) -3,479,423
Other funds Ch. 603 5(2) -633,614
Federal funds Ch. 603 7(1) -367,455
Article XI-P General
Obligation Bonds Debt
Service
General Fund Ch. 603 4 -1,956,319
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs and grants
General Fund Ch. 660 1(1) -494,020
Other funds Ch. 660 6(1) -36,918
Federal funds Ch. 660 7 -59,193
Debt Service
Community Colleges
General Fund Ch. 660
1(10)(b) -2,677,692
Debt Service
Public Universities
General Fund Ch. 660
1(10)(a) -7,461,057
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds Ch. 660 2 -4,654,468
Lottery Debt Service
- From Administrative
Services Economic
Development Fund
for Community Colleges
Lottery funds Ch. 660 3 -1,545,583
Debt Service - Lottery,
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
Other funds Ch. 660 6(3) +1,939,485
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 89
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund Ch. 469 1(1) -$33,561
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund Ch. 469 1(2) -21,043
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 469 2 -5,302
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 378 1 -33,596
Other funds Ch. 378 2 -11,532
Federal funds Ch. 378 3 -162,344
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 380 1 -53,732
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services
General Fund Ch. 606 1(1) -106,286
Other funds Ch. 606 2(1) -14,795
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(1) -125,763
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(2) -12,893,756
Other funds Ch. 606 2(2) -535,624
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(2) -7,349,430
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(3) -196,634
Other funds Ch. 606 2(3) -1,357
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(3) -98,911
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund Ch. 606 1(4) -8,608
Other funds Ch. 606 2(4) -755
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(4) -41,538
Child Welfare
General Fund Ch. 606 1(5) -3,722,564
Other funds Ch. 606 2(5) -11,692
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(5) -2,375,227
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(6) -235,189
Other funds Ch. 606 2(6) -16,108
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(6) -286,767
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 606 1(7) -20,235
Other funds Ch. 606 2(7) -42
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 90
Federal funds Ch. 606 3(7) -37,821
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 606 1(8) -1,406,985
Other funds Ch. 606 2(9) +1,112,515
Shared Services
Other funds Ch. 606 2(8) -156,595
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health
General Fund Ch. 668 1(1) -272,508
Other funds Ch. 668 2(1) -311,188
Lottery funds Ch. 668 3(1) -97
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(1) -311,692
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund Ch. 668 1(2) -166,598
Other funds Ch. 668 2(2) -36,811
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(2) -62
Central Services, State
Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 668 1(3) -12,869,243
Other funds Ch. 668 2(3) -1,981,320
Federal funds Ch. 668 5(3) -3,396,960
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds Ch. 668 2(4) -39,051
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Fit and Disability
Commission:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 167 1(1) -$16,357
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 557 1(2) -2,426,205
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 557 1(5) -5,111,991
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 444 1(8) -190,407
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 91
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 559 1(1) -$204,324
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 559 1(2) -3,308,287
Other funds Ch. 559 2(2) +627,060
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 559 6 -262,700
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 11 -130,806
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 14(1) -7,562
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 16 -5,636
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 17 -28,888
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 559 15 -35,929
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 92
Other funds Ch. 428 1(1) -$90,157
State Department of Energy:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 423 2 -269,199
Federal funds Ch. 423 4 -561
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
General Fund Ch. 5 1 +23,848
Geologic Survey
Other funds Ch. 5 2(1) -4,024
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds Ch. 5 2(2) -2,670
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Other funds Ch. 561 [ 2(1)]
1(1) -5,297
Lottery funds Ch. 561 [ 3(1)]
2(1) -5,045
Central Services
Other funds Ch. 561 [ 2(2)]
1(2) -934,468
Lottery funds Ch. 561 [ 3(2)]
2(2) -889,953
Direct Services
Other funds Ch. 561 [ 2(4)]
1(4) -169,981
Lottery funds Ch. 561 [ 3(4)]
2(4) -161,884
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 561 [ 4] 3 -864,620
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 439 1 +20,325
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(1) -312,386
Other funds Ch. 665 3(1) -3,416
Field Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(2) -53,394
Other funds Ch. 665 3(2) -18,248
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund Ch. 665 1(3) -14,033
Other funds Ch. 665 3(3) -23,674
Technical Services
General Fund Ch. 665 1(4) -12,335
Other funds Ch. 665 3(4) -11,108
Director’s Office
General Fund Ch. 665 1(5) -49,829
Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 93
Lottery funds Ch. 665 2 -7,485,210
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operating Expenses,
Activities and Projects
Lottery funds Ch. 680 5 -81,602
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund Programs
Other funds Ch. 607 1(1) -781,005
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds Ch. 607 1(3) -453
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund Ch. 600 1(1) -10,120
Other funds Ch. 600 2(1) -32,221
Food Safety
General Fund Ch. 600 1(2) -99,522
Other funds Ch. 600 2(2) -201,523
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(2) -5,700
Natural Resources
General Fund Ch. 600 1(3) -50,185
Other funds Ch. 600 2(3) -188,772
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(3) -28,785
Market Access
General Fund Ch. 600 1(4) -39,189
Other funds Ch. 600 2(4) -154,513
Federal funds Ch. 600 4(4) -24,874
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 600 3 -75,930
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund Ch. 673 1(1) -21,043
Other funds Ch. 673 2(1) -363,227
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(1) -3,361
Water Quality
General Fund Ch. 673 1(2) -25,425
Other funds Ch. 673 2(2) -98,503
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(2) -287,782
Land Quality
Other funds Ch. 673 2(3) -400,443
Federal funds Ch. 673 5(3) -3,685
Agency Management
Other funds Ch. 673 2(4) -1,250,464
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 94
Lottery funds Ch. 673 3 -6,402
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(1) -69
Other funds Ch. 679 2(1) -446,546
Lottery funds Ch. 679 3(1) -30
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(1) -121
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(2) -349
Other funds Ch. 679 2(2) -255,794
Lottery funds Ch. 679 3(2) -58
Federal funds Ch. 679 4(2) -1,843
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 679 1(3) -41,537
Other funds Ch. 679 2(3) -2,078,639
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds Ch. 605 2(1) -1,559,761
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(1) -1,138
Fire Protection
General Fund Ch. 605 1(2) -699,452
Other funds Ch. 605 2(2) -100,353
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(2) -62,451
Private Forests
General Fund Ch. 605 1(4) -167,457
Other funds Ch. 605 2(5) -15,136
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(5) -11,788
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 605 1(5) -2,059
Other funds Ch. 605 2(7) +2,060
State Forests
Other funds Ch. 605 2(3) -107,181
Federal funds Ch. 605 4(3) -875
Federal Forest Restoration
General Fund Ch. 605 1(3) -18,249
Equipment Pool
Other funds Ch. 605 2(8) -29,419
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds Ch. 605 2(9) -1,785
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Planning Program
General Fund Ch. 438 1(1) -170,597
Other funds Ch. 438 2 -2,493
Federal funds Ch. 438 3 -48,580
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 432 1 -1,251
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 95
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 429 1 -$133,859
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal
General Fund Ch. 470 1(1) -1,764,766
Other funds Ch. 470 2(1) -604,732
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(1) -17,855
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 470 1(2) -180,468
Other funds Ch. 470 2(2) -240,393
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(2) -2,319
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund Ch. 470 1(3) -174,006
Other funds Ch. 470 2(3) -434
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(3) -812
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund Ch. 470 1(4) -483,686
Other funds Ch. 470 2(4) -68,454
Federal funds Ch. 470 3(4) -19,753
Department of Corrections:
Operations and Health
Services
Other funds Ch. 468 2(1) -463,297
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 468 1(2) -11,413,687
Other funds Ch. 468 2(2) -280,760
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 468 1(5) -1,344,623
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 379 1 -117,953
Other funds Ch. 379 3 -531
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 96
Federal funds Ch. 379 4 -133
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund Ch. 433 1 -223,358
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 427 1(1) -2,553
Other funds Ch. 427 2(1) -166,372
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 427 1(2) -22,375
Other funds Ch. 427 2(2) -62,550
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund Ch. 427 1(3) -67,301
Other funds Ch. 427 2(4) -112,150
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(2) -304
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 427 1(4) -25,051
Other funds Ch. 427 2(5) -81,464
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(3) -50,134
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund Ch. 427 1(5) -1,906,462
Division of Child Support
General Fund Ch. 427 1(6) -294,558
Other funds Ch. 427 2(8) -155,495
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(4) -811,203
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(3) -1,058,659
Federal funds Ch. 427 3(1) -25,480
General Counsel Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(6) -242,529
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 427 2(7) -272,137
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 662 1(1) -419,147
Other funds Ch. 662 2(1) -3,320
Operations
General Fund Ch. 662 1(2) -152,755
Other funds Ch. 662 2(2) -10,541
Federal funds Ch. 662 [ 3(1)]
3(2) -679,018
Emergency Management
General Fund Ch. 662 1(3) -446,105
Other funds Ch. 662 2(3) -117,652
Federal funds Ch. 662 [ 3(2)]
3(3) -10,391
Community Support
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 97
General Fund Ch. 662 1(4) -5,875
Other funds Ch. 662 2(4) -13,787
Federal funds Ch. 662 [ 3(3)]
3(4) -37,944
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 662 1(5) -270,250
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 381 2(1) -410,560
Federal funds Ch. 381 3 -2,797
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund Ch. 430 1(1) -155,820
Community Programs
General Fund Ch. 430 1(2) -159,342
Federal funds Ch. 430 3(1) -32,267
Program Support
General Fund Ch. 430 1(3) -2,788,587
Federal funds Ch. 430 3(2) -97,549
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 430 1(6) -4,808,726
[Other funds Ch. 430 2(4) +1,137,980 ]
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 602 1(1) -$31,667
Department of
Transportation:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 442 1 -547
Other funds Ch. 442 2(18) +550
Lottery funds Ch. 442 4 -3,539,712
Maintenance and Emergency
Relief Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(2) -4,932,261
Preservation Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(3) -998
Bridge Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(4) -3,137
Operations Program
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 98
Other funds Ch. 442 2(5) -20,692
Modernization Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(6) -40,581
Special Programs
Other funds Ch. 442 2(7) -664,181
Local Government Program
Other funds Ch. 442 2(8) -807
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds Ch. 442 2(9) -367,454
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds Ch. 442 2(10) -16,288
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds Ch. 442 2(11) -19,610
Federal funds Ch. 442 3(3) -326
Public Transit
Other funds Ch. 442 2(12) -197
Rail
Other funds Ch. 442 2(13) -60,120
Federal funds Ch. 442 3(5) -72,556
Transportation Safety
Other funds Ch. 442 2(14) -521
Federal funds Ch. 442 3(6) -195
Support Services
Other funds Ch. 442 2(15) -3,221,439
Headquarters
Other funds Ch. 442 2(16) -9,018
Finance and Budget
Other funds Ch. 442 2(17) -1,760,106
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 469.
This 2022 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 99
Passed by House March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 100